Medley Management Inc. | Alternative Asset Management  Medley is an alternative asset management firm offering yield solutions to retail and institutional investors. Medley’s national direct origination franchise, with over 85 people, is a premier provider of capital to the middle market in the U.S. Medley has over $5 billion of assets under management in two business development companies, Medley Capital Corporation (NYSE: MCC) and Sierra Income Corporation, as well as private investment vehicles.  Over the past 15 years, we have provided capital to over 350 companies across 35 industries in North America.(1)  Medley Capital 40-APP Jul 26 2016 | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Medley Capital (MCC)FORM 40-APP | Jul 26 2016|About: Medley Capital (MCC)View as PDF

 MOF II Management LLC (Form: 40-APP, Received: 07/26/2016 16:47:27) 









	 



	File No.              




	 




	U.S. SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION




	Washington,
	D.C. 20549





	 




	 




	APPLICATION
	FOR AN ORDER PURSUANT TO SECTIONS 17(d) AND 57(i) OF THE INVESTMENT COMPANY ACT OF 1940, AND RULE 17d-1
	UNDER THE ACT PERMITTING CERTAIN JOINT TRANSACTIONS OTHERWISE PROHIBITED BY SECTIONS 17(d) AND 57(a)(4) OF THE ACT AND RULE
	17d-1 UNDER THE ACT.


	 





	MEDLEY CAPITAL CORPORATION,
	MEDLEY LLC, MCC ADVISORS LLC, MEDLEY CAPITAL LLC, MEDLEY OPPORTUNITY FUND II LP, MOF II GP LLC, MEDLEY OPPORTUNITY FUND III LP, MOF III GP LLC, MOF
	II MANAGEMENT LLC, MOF III MANAGEMENT LLC, MEDLEY SBIC, LP, MEDLEY SBIC GP, LLC, MEDLEY CREDIT STRATEGIES (KOC) LLC, SIERRA INCOME
	CORPORATION, SIC ADVISORS LLC, SIERRA TOTAL RETURN FUND, STRF ADVISORS LLC



	 


	280 Park Avenue, 6

	th

	Floor East


	New York, NY 10017


	(212) 759-0777


	 




	 





	All Communications, Notices and Orders
	to:



	 


	Brook Taube


	Medley Capital Corporation


	Seth Taube


	Sierra Income Corporation

	Sierra Total Return Fund


	280 Park Avenue, 6

	th

	Floor East


	New York, NY 10017


	(212) 759-0777


	 




	 





	Copies to:



	 


	Steven B. Boehm, Esq.


	Harry S. Pangas, Esq.


	Payam Siadatpour, Esq.


	Sutherland Asbill & Brennan LLP


	700 6

	th

	Street, N.W.


	Washington, DC 20001


	(202) 383-0100


	 


	July 26, 2016


	 






	 









	 







	 






	UNITED STATES OF AMERICA




	Before the




	SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION



	 






	In the Matter of

	:


	 



	MEDLEY CAPITAL




	CORPORATION, MEDLEY
	LLC,




	MCC ADVISORS LLC, MEDLEY




	CAPITAL LLC, MEDLEY




	OPPORTUNITY FUND




	II LP, MOF II GP LLC,




	MEDLEY OPPORTUNITY FUND III LP,




	MOF III GP LLC, MOF II
	MANAGEMENT




	LLC, MOF III MANAGEMENT
	LLC,




	MEDLEY SBIC, LP, MEDLEY
	SBIC




	GP, LLC, MEDLEY CREDIT




	STRATEGIES (KOC) LLC,
	SIERRA




	INCOME CORPORATION,
	SIC




	ADVISORS LLC, SIERRA
	TOTAL




	RETURN FUND, STRF ADVISORS
	LLC




	 



	 


	280 Park Avenue,
	6

	th

	Floor East


	New York, NY 10017


	(212) 759-0777


	 


	File No.


	Investment Company Act of 1940




	)


	)


	)


	)


	)


	)


	)


	)


	)


	)


	)


	)


	)


	)


	)


	)


	)


	)


	)


	)


	)



	 



	APPLICATION FOR AN ORDER PURSUANT TO SECTIONS 17(d) AND
	57(i) OF THE INVESTMENT COMPANY ACT OF 1940 AND RULE 17d-1 UNDER THE ACT PERMITTING CERTAIN JOINT TRANSACTIONS OTHERWISE
	PROHIBITED BY SECTIONS 17(d) AND 57(a)(4) OF THE ACT AND RULE 17d-1 UNDER THE ACT.






	 






	 




	 




	INTRODUCTION




	 


	The following entities hereby request
	an order (the “


	Order


	”) of the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission
	(the “


	Commission


	”) pursuant to Sections 17(d) and 57(i) of the Investment Company
	Act of 1940, as amended (the “


	Act


	”),

	1

	 and Rule 17d-1 promulgated under
	the Act,

	2

	 permitting certain joint transactions that otherwise may be prohibited by either or
	both of Sections 17(d) and 57(a)(4):


	 






	 





	1


	Unless otherwise indicated, all section references herein are to the Act.




	2


	Unless
	otherwise indicated, all rule references herein are to rules under the Act.



	 









	1

	 







	 




	 







	·




	Medley
	Capital Corporation (“


	MCC


	”),





	 







	·




	Medley
	SBIC, LP (“


	Medley SBIC


	”) and its general partner, Medley SBIC GP, LLC (the “


	SBIC General
	Partner


	”),





	 







	·




	Medley
	LLC, the holding company for the Regulated Entity Advisers and the Existing Affiliated Investment Advisers (each as defined below),





	 







	·




	MCC
	Advisors LLC, MCC’s investment adviser (“


	MCC Advisors


	”),





	 







	·




	Medley Capital LLC, MOF II Management LLC, and
	MOF III
	Management LLC (collectively, the “


	Existing Affiliated Investment
	Advisers


	”),

	3










	 







	·



	MOF II GP LLC, MOF III GP LLC, and Medley Credit Strategies GP, LLC (collectively, the “


	Existing
	General
	Partners


	”),

	4





	 







	·



	Medley Opportunity Fund III LP, Medley Opportunity Fund II LP and Medley Credit Strategies (KOC) LLC (collectively, the
	“


	Existing
	Affiliated
	Funds


	”),

	5





	 







	·




	Sierra
	Income Corporation (“


	Sierra


	”),





	 







	·




	SIC Advisors LLC, Sierra’s investment adviser (


	“SIC
	Advisors”


	),





	 


	 


	 




	 



	·



	Sierra Total Return Fund (


	“STRF”


	),
	and




	 


	 


	 




	 



	·



	STRF Advisors LLC, STRF's investment adviser (

	"STRF
	Advisors"

	).




	 


	In this Application:


	 







	·




	The term “


	Affiliated Funds”


	 means the
	Existing Affiliated Funds and the Future Affiliated Funds (as defined below).





	 







	·




	The term “


	Affiliated Investment Advisers


	”
	means the Existing Affiliated Investment Advisers, together with any future investment advisers that Medley LLC controls.





	 






	 







	3

	The Existing Affiliated Investment Advisers
	are domestic limited liability companies and are directly wholly-owned by and directly controlled by, Medley LLC. Medley LLC,
	which is controlled by Medley Management Inc., a publicly traded asset management firm, which in turn is controlled by Medley
	Group LLC, an entity controlled by the Principals. Medley LLC currently is exempt from registration
	under the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, as amended (the “Advisers Act”), as a holding company that does not
	directly advise an investment company. Medley Capital LLC, Medley Credit Strategies LLC and MOF II Management LLC are
	registered investment advisers under the Advisers Act.



	4

	The Existing General Partners are directly wholly-owned
	by, and directly controlled by, Medley GP Holdings LLC. Medley GP Holdings LLC is controlled by the Principals (as defined below).



	5


	No Existing Affiliated Fund is a
	subsidiary of a Regulated Entity (as defined below).





	 









	2

	 







	 




	  







	·




	The term “


	Applicants


	” refers to MCC,
	Sierra, Medley SBIC, SBIC General Partner, Medley LLC, MCC Advisors, SIC Advisors, STRF, STRF Advisors the Existing
	Affiliated
	Investment
	Advisers, the Existing General Partners and the Existing Affiliated Funds.





	 







	·




	The term “


	Board”


	 means, with
	respect to any Regulated Entity (as defined below), the board of directors or trustees, as applicable, of that Regulated
	Entity
	(including the
	MCC Board,
	for MCC, the
	Sierra Board, for Sierra, and the STRF Board, for STRF).





	 







	·




	The term


	 “Co-Investment Transaction


	”
	means any transaction in which a Regulated Entity (or its Wholly-Owned Investment Sub, as defined below) participated, in reliance
	on the Order or the Prior Order (as defined below), (a) together with one or more other Regulated Entities and/or
	(b) together with one or more Affiliated Funds.





	 







	·




	The term “


	Future Affiliated
	Funds”


	 means any entity whose (i) investment adviser is an Affiliated Investment Adviser, (ii) that would
	be an investment company but for section 3(c)(1) or 3(c)(7) of the Act, (iii) that is not a subsidiary of a Regulated
	Entity, and (iv) that intends to participate in the Co-Investment Program (as defined below).





	 







	·




	The
	term “


	Independent Directors


	”

	, as used in this application, refers to the directors or trustees, as applicable,
	of a Regulated Entity who are not “interested persons” of the Regulated Entity as defined in Section
	2(a)(19) of the Act.




	 







	·




	The
	term “


	Participating Funds


	”




	means Affiliated Funds that have the capacity to, and elect
	to, co-invest with the Regulated Entities.





	 







	·




	The
	term “


	Potential Co-Investment Transaction


	” means any investment opportunity in which a Regulated Entity
	(or its Wholly-Owned Investment Sub) could not participate together with one or more Regulated Entities and/or together with one
	or more Affiliated Funds without obtaining and relying on the Order.





	 







	·




	The
	term “


	Regulated Entity


	” means any of (i) MCC; (ii) Sierra; (iii) STRF;

	and (iv) any future closed-end investment company (a) that
	is registered under the Act or has elected to be regulated as a BDC

	6

	under the Act, (b) whose investment adviser is
	a Regulated Entity Adviser, and (c) that intends to participate in the Co-Investment Program.




	 







	·




	The term “


	Regulated Entity Advisers


	”
	means (i) MCC Advisors, (ii) SIC Advisors, (iii) STRF Advisors, and (iv) any future investment adviser that Medley LLC
	controls.





	 







	·




	The term “


	SBIC Subsidiary


	” means an entity
	that is licensed by the Small Business Administration (the “


	SBA


	”) to operate under the Small Business
	Investment Act of 1958, as amended, (the “


	SBA Act


	”) as a small business investment company (an “


	SBIC


	”).





	 






	 







	6


	Section 2(a)(48) defines a business development company (“


	BDC


	”) to be any closed-end investment
	company that operates for the purpose of making investments in securities described in section 55(a)(1) through 55(a)(3) of the
	Act and makes available significant managerial assistance with respect to the issuers of such securities.



	 









	3

	 







	 




	 







	·




	The term “


	Wholly-Owned Investment Sub


	” means
	an entity (i) that is wholly-owned by a Regulated Entity (with such Regulated Entity at all times holding, beneficially and of
	record, 100% of the voting and economic interests), (ii) whose sole business purpose is to hold one or more investments on behalf
	of such Regulated Entity (and, in the case of an SBIC Subsidiary, maintain a license under the SBA Act and issue debentures guaranteed
	by the SBA); (iii) with respect to which the Regulated Entity’s Board has the sole authority to make all determinations with
	respect to the entity’s participation under the conditions of this Application; and (iv) that would be an investment company
	but for section 3(c)(1) or 3(c)(7) of the Act. All subsidiaries participating in the Co-Investment Program will be Wholly-Owned
	Investment Subs and will have Objectives and Strategies (as defined below) that are either substantially the same as, or a subset
	of, their parent Regulated Entity’s Objectives and Strategies. An SBIC Subsidiary may be a Wholly-Owned Investment Sub if
	it satisfies the conditions in this definition.





	 


	The Order would supersede an
	exemptive order issued by the Commission on November 25, 2013 (the “


	Prior
	Order


	”)

	7

	 that was granted pursuant to Sections 57(a)(4) and 57(i) and Rule 17d-1,
	with the result that no person will continue to rely on the Prior Order if the Order is granted.


	 


	The relief requested in
	this application for an Order (the “


	Application


	”) would allow a Regulated Entity and one or
	more other Regulated Entities and/or one or more Affiliated Funds to participate in the same investment opportunities through
	a proposed co-investment program where such participation would otherwise be prohibited under Sections 17(d) and 57(a)(4) and
	Rule 17d-1 (the “


	Co-Investment Program


	”).

	8



	 


	A Regulated Entity may, from time
	to time, form one or more Wholly-Owned Investment Subs. Such a subsidiary would be prohibited from investing in a
	Co-Investment Transaction with any Affiliated Fund or another Regulated Entity because it would be a company controlled by
	the Regulated Entity for purposes of Sections 17(d) and 57(a)(4) and Rule 17d-1. Applicants request that each Wholly-Owned
	Investment Sub be permitted to participate in Co-Investment Transactions in lieu of the Regulated Entity that owns it and
	that the Wholly-Owned Investment Sub’s participation in any such transaction be treated, for purposes of the Order, as though the Regulated Entity were participating directly. Applicants represent that this treatment is justified
	because a Wholly-Owned Investment Sub would have no purpose other than serving as a holding vehicle for the Regulated
	Entity’s investments and, therefore, no conflicts of interest could arise between the Regulated Entity and the
	Wholly-Owned Investment Sub. The Regulated Entity’s Board would make all relevant determinations under the conditions
	with regard to a Wholly-Owned Investment Sub’s participation in a Co-Investment Transaction, and the Regulated
	Entity’s Board would be informed of, and take into consideration, any proposed use of a Wholly-Owned Investment Sub in
	the Regulated Entity’s place. If the Regulated Entity proposes to participate in the same Co-Investment Transaction
	with any of its Wholly-Owned Investment Subs, the Board of the Regulated Entity will also be informed of, and take into
	consideration, the relative participation of the Regulated Entity and the Wholly-Owned Investment Sub.


	 






	 





	7


	In
	the Matter of Medley Capital Corporation, et al.,

	 Investment Company Act Release Nos. 30769
	(Oct. 28, 2013) (notice) and 30807 (Nov. 25, 2013) (order).



	8

	A Regulated Entity may, subject to the terms and conditions of the Order, make additional
	investments in securities of issuers, including through the exercise of warrants, conversion privileges, and other rights to purchase
	securities of the issuers (“


	Follow-On Investments


	”).


	 









	4

	 







	 




	 


	All existing entities that currently intend
	to rely on the Order have been named as Applicants. Any other existing or future entity that relies on the Order
	in the future will comply with the terms and conditions of the Application.


	 



	I. 

	APPLICANTS




	 







	A.




	Medley Capital Corporation





	 


	MCC is an externally managed, closed-end,
	non-diversified management investment company that has elected to be regulated as a BDC. MCC filed a registration statement
	on Form N-2 under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the “


	1933 Act


	”) in connection with its initial
	public offering, which became effective on January 20, 2011. In addition, MCC has elected to be treated as a regulated investment
	company (“


	RIC


	”) under Subchapter M of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (the “


	Code


	”)
	and intends to continue to qualify as a RIC in the future. MCC’s principal place of business is 280 Park Avenue, 6

	th

	Floor East, New York, New York 10017.


	 


	MCC’s investment objective is to
	generate current income and capital appreciation by lending directly to privately-held middle market companies. MCC’s investments
	are made directly through MCC, and may in the future be made through one or more Wholly-Owned Investment Subs that MCC may establish
	from time to time. Such Wholly-Owned Investment Subs will have Objectives and Strategies (as defined below) that are substantially
	the same as, or a subset of, those of MCC, although the Wholly-Owned Investment Subs will be subject to different regulatory regimes.
	MCC’s portfolio will generally consist of secured loans, and, to a lesser extent, subordinate loans and equity positions
	in situations where they are also a secured lender. MCC seeks to provide customized financing solutions, typically in the form
	of secured loans to corporate and asset-based borrowers, and may utilize structures such as sale leaseback transactions, direct
	asset purchases or other hybrid structures that it believes replicate the economics and risk profile of secured loans. MCC may
	also selectively make subordinated debt and equity investments in borrowers to which they have extended secured debt financing.
	MCC believes that its proposed investment strategy will allow it to generate cash available for distribution to its stockholders
	and to provide competitive total returns to its stockholders.


	 


	MCC’s business and affairs
	are managed under the direction of MCC’s board of directors (the “


	MCC Board


	”). The MCC
	Board currently consists of seven members, four of whom are Independent Directors.


	 


	Each of Brook Taube and
	Seth Taube

	 

	(the


	 “Principals”


	) and Jeff Tonkel serves as a director on
	the MCC Board. The MCC Board delegates daily management and investment authority to MCC Advisors pursuant to
	an investment management agreement (the


	 “Investment




	Management
	Agreement


	”). MCC Advisors also serves as MCC’s administrator pursuant to an administration agreement (the
	“


	Medley Administration Agreement


	”). Seth Taube is not an officer of MCC. Brook Taube serves as
	MCC’s Chief Executive Officer. Jeff Tonkel serves as Medley Management Inc.’s President. None of the Principals
	nor any members of Medley LLC’s senior management team will benefit directly or indirectly from any Co-Investment
	Transaction, other than by virtue of the ownership of securities of MCC and the Affiliated Investment Advisers, and none will
	participate individually in any Co-Investment Transaction.


	 









	5

	 







	 




	 







	B.




	Medley SBIC, LP and Medley SBIC GP, LLC





	 


	Medley SBIC was organized as a limited
	partnership under the laws of the state of Delaware on February 8, 2012, and submitted an application for a license to operate
	as an SBIC under the SBA Act with the SBA on December 9, 2011 (the “


	SBIC Application


	”). Medley SBIC
	has the same investment objective and strategies as MCC, as summarized above.


	 


	On March 26, 2013, Medley SBIC received an
	SBIC license from the SBA. As a result, MCC now has the ability to issue, through Medley SBIC, debentures guaranteed by the SBA
	at favorable interest rates. Medley SBIC will not be registered under the Act based on the exclusion from the definition of investment
	company contained in Section 3(c)(7). MCC directly owns a 100% limited partnership interest in Medley SBIC.


	 


	The SBIC General Partner was organized
	as a limited liability company under the laws of the state of Delaware on February 8, 2012, and is a wholly-owned subsidiary
	of MCC, which is the sole member of the SBIC General Partner. Each of the Principals are managers of the SBIC General Partner.
	MCC may remove the managers of the SBIC General Partner at any time, with or without cause, subject to the approval of the SBA.


	 


	Medley SBIC is functionally a wholly-owned
	subsidiary of MCC because MCC and the SBIC General Partner (which is a wholly-owned subsidiary of MCC) own all of the equity and
	voting interests in Medley SBIC.


	 


	MCC effectively controls Medley SBIC because
	SBIC General Partner is a wholly-owned subsidiary of MCC. MCC’s Board may remove the managers of SBIC General Partner with
	or without cause, subject to SBA approval. Moreover, MCC owns all of the limited partnership interests of Medley SBIC, and believes
	that its oversight of Medley SBIC is appropriate to protect MCC’s interests. Accordingly, the MCC Board effectively has the
	power to exercise authority and provides oversight with respect to Medley SBIC and will in fact exercise such authority and provide
	such oversight.


	 


	Subject to the overall supervision of the
	MCC Board, MCC Advisors will serve as the investment adviser to Medley SBIC pursuant to a management services agreement dated as
	of March 23, 2012 (as amended and re-approved from time to time by the MCC Board, the “


	Management Services Agreement


	”).


	 


	On March 27, 2012, MCC, Medley SBIC, the
	SBIC General Partner and MCC Advisors filed an application with the Commission for an order pursuant to Section 6(c) granting
	exemptions from Sections 18(a) and 61(a). On November 14, 2012, the Commission issued an order (the “


	SBIC Order


	”)

	9

	 
	permitting MCC to adhere to a modified asset coverage requirement under Section 61 with respect to any direct or indirect
	wholly owned subsidiary of MCC that is an SBIC and relies on section 3(c)(7) for an exemption from the definition of an “investment
	company” under the Act.


	 






	 





	9



	Medley Capital Corporation et.al.

	Investment Company Act Release Nos. 30234 (Oct. 16, 2012) (notice) and 30262 (Nov. 14,
	2012) (order).



	 









	6

	 







	 




	 







	C.




	Sierra Income Corporation





	 


	Sierra is an externally managed, non-diversified
	closed-end management investment company that has elected to be regulated as a BDC under the Act. Sierra filed a registration statement
	on Form N-2 (File No. 333-175624) under the 1933 Act in connection with its initial public offering, which became effective
	on April 16, 2012. Sierra is offering on a best efforts, continuous basis 150,000,000 shares of its common stock. In addition, Sierra intends to make an election to be treated for federal
	income tax purposes as a RIC under the Code, and intends to continue to make such election in the future. Sierra’s principal
	place of business is 280 Park Avenue, 6

	th

	 Floor East, New York, New York 10017.


	 


	Sierra’s investment objective is
	to generate current income and capital appreciation by investing primarily in the debt of privately-held U.S. companies with a
	focus on senior secured debt, second lien debt and, to a lesser extent, subordinated debt. Sierra’s investments are made
	directly through Sierra, and may in the future be made through one or more Wholly-Owned Investment Subs that Sierra may establish
	from time to time. Such Wholly-Owned Investment Subs will have Objectives and Strategies (as defined below) that are substantially
	the same as, or a subset of, those of Sierra, although the Wholly-Owned Investment Subs will be subject to different regulatory
	regimes. Sierra intends to originate transactions sourced through the existing network of its advisor, SIC Advisors, and expects
	to acquire debt securities through the secondary market. Sierra may make equity investments in companies but does not expect this
	to be a substantial portion of its portfolio.


	 


	Sierra’s business and
	affairs are managed under the direction of a board of directors (the 


	“Sierra Board


	”). The
	Sierra Board currently consists of five members, three of whom are Independent Directors.


	Each of the




	Principals serves as an interested director on the Sierra Board. Seth Taube also serves as the Chief Executive Officer of
	Sierra. Jeff Tonkel serves as the President of Sierra. The Sierra Board delegates daily management and investment authority
	to the SIC Advisors pursuant to an investment management agreement (the “


	Sierra Investment Management
	Agreement


	”). Medley Capital LLC serves as Sierra’s administrator pursuant to an administration
	agreement (the 


	“Sierra Administration Agreement


	”). The responsibilities of Medley Capital LLC
	under the Sierra Administration Agreement include overseeing Sierra’s financial records, preparing reports to Sierra
	stockholders and reports filed with the Commission, and generally monitoring the payment of Sierra’s expenses and the
	performance of administrative and professional services rendered to Sierra by others.


	 









	D.




	Sierra Total Return Fund






	 



	STRF is
	an externally managed, non-diversified, closed-end management investment company registered under the 1940 Act. STRF will
	be operated as an interval fund. STRF filed a registration statement on Form N-2 (File No.s 811-23137 and 333-209496) under
	the 1940 Act and the 1933 Act in connection with its initial public offering. STRF is offering on a best efforts,
	continuous basis 100,000,000 shares of beneficial interest of STRF. In addition, STRF intends
	to make an election to be treated for federal income tax purposes as a RIC under the Code, and intends to continue to make
	such election in the future. STRF’s principal place of business is 280 Park Avenue, 6th Floor East, New York, New York
	10017.


	 




	STRF’s Objectives
	and Strategies are similar to the Objectives and Strategies of each of the other Regulated Entities. STRF’s investment objective
	is to generate total return through a combination of current income and long-term capital appreciation by investing in a portfolio
	of debt securities and equities. STRF intends to meet its investment objectives by investing in the debt of U.S. companies with
	a focus on transactions sourced for STRF by STRF Advisors, including in fixed-income oriented funds. STRF anticipates that a substantial
	portion of its portfolio will consist of senior and subordinated debt. STRF’s debt investments may take the form of corporate
	loans or bonds, may be secured or unsecured and may, in some cases, be accompanied by warrants, options or other forms of equity
	participation. STRF may also allocate capital for investment in any part of the capital structure, including distressed and more
	subordinated positions, where the STRF Advisors believes the borrower and the potential investment present an opportunity for
	risk-adjusted income and returns. STRF may separately purchase common or preferred equity interests in transactions. STRF’s
	portfolio is expected to include fixed-rate investments that generate absolute returns as well as floating-rate investments that
	allow coupons to rise in rising interest rate and inflationary environments. STRF may also invest in non-controlling interests
	in equity and junior debt tranches of collateralized debt obligations, which include collateralized bond
	obligations, collateralized loan obligations and other securitized products, that invest
	principally in loans and fixed-income instruments (or other instruments, including derivative instruments, with similar economic
	characteristics).


	 


	STRF’s business and affairs are
	managed under the direction of a board of trustees (the


	“STRF Board


	”). The STRF Board currently
	consists of five members, three of whom are Independent Directors. Each of the Principals serves as an interested trustee
	on the STRF Board. Seth Taube also serves as the Chief Executive Officer of STRF. Jeff Tonkel serves as the President of
	STRF. The STRF Board delegates daily management and investment authority to the STRF Advisors pursuant to an investment
	management agreement (the “


	STRF Investment Management Agreement


	”). Medley Capital LLC serves as
	Sierra’s administrator pursuant to an administration agreement (the


	“STRF




	Administration
	Agreement


	”). The responsibilities of Medley Capital LLC under the STRF Administration Agreement
	include overseeing STRF’s financial records, preparing reports to STRF stockholders and reports filed with the
	Commission, and generally monitoring the payment of STRF’s expenses and the performance of administrative and
	professional services rendered to STRF.




	 







	E.




	Medley LLC





	 




	Medley LLC is controlled by Medley
	Management Inc., a publicly traded asset management firm, which in turn is controlled by Medley Group LLC, an entity
	controlled by the Principals.


	 









	7

	 







	 




	 







	F.




	The Regulated Entity Advisers, the Existing Affiliated Investment Advisers and Affiliated Investment Advisers





	 



	MCC Advisors. 

	MCC Advisors,
	a Delaware limited liability company that is registered as an investment adviser under the Advisers Act serves as the investment
	adviser to MCC and Medley SBIC pursuant to the Investment Management Agreement and the Management Services Agreement (collectively,
	the “


	Management Agreements


	”). Subject to the overall supervision of the Board, MCC Advisors manages
	the day-to-day operations of, and provides investment advisory and management services to, MCC and Medley SBIC. Under the
	terms of the Management Agreements, MCC Advisors: (i) determines the composition of MCC’s and Medley SBIC’s portfolios,
	the nature and timing of the changes to such portfolios and the manner of implementing such changes; (ii) identifies, evaluates
	and negotiates the structure of the investments that MCC and Medley SBIC make (including performing due diligence on prospective
	portfolio companies); (iii) closes and monitors the investments MCC and Medley SBIC make; and (iv) determines the securities
	and other assets that MCC and Medley SBIC purchases, retains or sells. MCC Advisors’ services under the Management Agreements
	are not exclusive, and it is free to furnish similar services to other entities, consistent with its fiduciary duties to MCC and
	Medley SBIC.


	 


	Pursuant to the Medley Administration Agreement,
	MCC Advisors furnishes MCC with office equipment and clerical, bookkeeping and record keeping services at MCC’s office facilities.
	Under the Medley Administration Agreement, MCC Advisors also performs, or oversees the performance of, MCC’s required administrative
	services, which include, among other things, providing assistance in accounting, legal, compliance, operations, technology and
	investor relations. MCC Advisors is responsible for the financial records that MCC is required to maintain and prepares reports
	to MCC’s stockholders and reports filed with the Commission. In addition, MCC Advisors assists MCC in determining and publishing
	MCC’s net asset value, oversees the preparation and filing of MCC’s tax returns and the printing and dissemination
	of reports to MCC’s stockholders, and generally oversees the payment of MCC’s expenses and the performance of administrative
	and professional services rendered to MCC by others.


	 



	SIC Advisors. 

	SIC Advisors,
	a Delaware limited liability company that is registered as an investment adviser under the Advisers Act, serves as the investment
	adviser to Sierra pursuant to the Sierra Investment Management Agreement. SIC Advisors is a majority owned subsidiary of Medley,
	LLC. Subject to the overall supervision of the Sierra Board, SIC Advisors manages the day-to-day operations of, and provides investment
	advisory and management services to, Sierra. Under the terms of the Sierra Investment Management Agreement, SIC Advisors:
	(i) determines the composition of Sierra’s portfolio, the nature and timing of the changes to Sierra’s portfolio
	and the manner of implementing such changes; (ii) identifies, evaluates and negotiates the structure of the investments Sierra
	makes (including performing due diligence on the Sierra’s prospective portfolio companies); (iii) closes and monitors
	the investments Sierra makes; and (iv) determines the securities and other assets that Sierra purchases, retains or sells. SIC
	Advisors’ services under the Sierra Investment Management Agreement are not exclusive, and it is free to furnish similar
	services to other entities, consistent with its fiduciary duties to Sierra. The Principals are, collectively, majority owners of
	SIC Advisors.


	 





	STRF Advisors.

	STRF Advisors, a
	Delaware limited liability company that is registered as an investment adviser under the Advisers Act, serves as the investment
	adviser to STRF pursuant to the STRF Investment Management Agreement. STRF Advisors is a majority owned subsidiary of Medley,
	LLC. Subject to the overall supervision of the STRF Board, STRF Advisors manages the day-to-day operations of, and provides investment
	advisory and management services to, STRF. Under the terms of the STRF Investment Management Agreement, STRF Advisors: (i) determines
	the composition of STRF’s portfolio, the nature and timing of the changes to STRF’s portfolio and the manner of
	implementing such changes; (ii) identifies, evaluates and negotiates the structure of the investments STRF makes (including performing
	due diligence on the STRF’s prospective portfolio companies); (iii) closes and monitors the investments STRF makes; and
	(iv) determines the securities and other assets that STRF purchases, retains or sells. STRF Advisors’ services under the
	STRF Investment Management Agreement are not exclusive, and it is free to furnish similar services to other entities, consistent
	with its fiduciary duties to STRF. The Principals are, collectively, majority owners of STRF Advisors.




	 









	8

	 







	 




	 



	The Existing Affiliated Investment Advisers. 

	The
	Existing Affiliated Investment Advisers currently serve as investment advisers to the Existing Affiliated Funds. Additionally,
	the Affiliated Investment Advisers may serve as investment adviser to Future Affiliated Funds.


	 


	The Regulated Entity Advisers and the Affiliated
	Investment Advisers are controlled by Medley LLC. The Principals control Medley LLC.


	 







	G.




	Existing Affiliated Funds





	  



	Medley Opportunity Fund II LP



	 


	Medley Opportunity Fund II LP is a Delaware
	limited partnership. MOF II GP LLC, a Delaware limited liability company, is the general partner of Medley Opportunity Fund II
	LP and MOF II Management LLC, a Delaware limited liability company, is the investment adviser for Medley Opportunity Fund II LP.
	The Principals are the managing members of MOF II GP LLC and MOF II Management LLC. MOF II GP LLC is responsible for managing the
	business of Medley Opportunity Fund II LP. MOF II Management LLC is responsible for investment advisory services for Medley Opportunity
	Fund II LP. MOF II Management LLC is under common control of Medley LLC. MOF II GP LLC is under common control of Medley GP Holdings
	LLC.


	 


	The investment strategy of Medley Opportunity
	Fund II LP is to generate current income and capital appreciation by lending directly to privately-held middle market companies.
	The investment strategy of Medley Opportunity Fund II LP is similar to the Regulated Entities’ respective investment strategies.


	 



	Medley Opportunity Fund III LP



	 


	Medley Opportunity Fund III LP is a Delaware limited partnership. MOF III GP LLC, a Delaware
	limited liability company, is the general partner of Medley Opportunity Fund III LP and MOF III Management LLC, a Delaware
	limited liability company, is the investment adviser for Medley Opportunity Fund III LP. The Principals are the managing members
	of MOF III GP LLC and MOF III Management LLC. MOF III GP LLC is responsible for managing the business of Medley Opportunity
	Fund III LP. MOF III Management LLC is responsible for investment advisory services for Medley Opportunity Fund III LP. MOF
	III Management LLC is under common control of Medley LLC. MOF III GP LLC is under common control of Medley GP Holdings LLC.


	 


	The investment strategy of Medley Opportunity Fund III LP is to generate current income and capital appreciation by lending
	directly to privately-held middle market companies. The investment strategy of Medley Opportunity Fund III LP is similar to
	the Regulated Entities' respective investment strategies.


	 



	Medley Credit Strategies (KOC) LLC



	 


	Medley Credit Strategies (KOC)
	LLC is a Delaware limited liability company. Medley SMA Advisors LLC, a Delaware limited liability company, is the manager
	and the investment adviser for Medley Credit Strategies (KOC) LLC. Medley LLC is the sole member of Medley SMA Advisors LLC.
	Medley SMA Advisors LLC is responsible for investment advisory services for and management of Medley Credit Strategies (KOC)
	LLC. The primary investment strategy of Medley Credit Strategies (KOC) LLC is to generate current income and capital appreciation
	by lending directly to privately-held middle market companies. The investment strategy of Medley Credit Strategies (KOC) LLC
	is similar to the Regulated Entities' respective investment strategies.


	 









	9

	 







	 






	 



	II. 

	RELIEF FOR PROPOSED CO-INVESTMENT TRANSACTIONS




	 







	A.




	Co-Investment in Portfolio Companies by the Regulated Entities and the Affiliated Funds





	 


	It is anticipated that each Regulated Entity
	may co-invest in portfolio companies with one or more Affiliated Funds advised by the Affiliated Investment Advisers and/or one
	or more other Regulated Entities.


	 


	The Regulated Entity Advisers and the Regulated
	Entities believe that determining the allocation of a co-investment opportunity based on a 

	pro rata 

	share of the
	capital available for investment by the applicable Regulated Entities and the Participating Funds provides for the equitable allocation
	of co-investments and takes into account the current capacity of such Regulated Entities and Participating Funds to make the type
	of investment presented by the co-investment opportunity.


	 






	1.


	Reasons for Co-Investing




	 


	It is anticipated that co-investment in
	portfolio companies by the Regulated Entities and the Affiliated Funds should increase the number of favorable investment opportunities
	for the Regulated Entities. The Co-Investment Program will be implemented if it is approved by a Required Majority (as defined
	below) of the applicable Regulated Entity.


	 


	The Regulated Entity Advisers expect that
	co-investment by the Regulated Entities and the Affiliated Funds, or among the Regulated Entities themselves, will provide the
	Regulated Entities with the ability to achieve greater diversification and, together with the Affiliated Funds, the opportunity
	to exercise greater influence on the portfolio companies in which the Regulated Entities and the Participating Funds co-invest.


	 


	A BDC that makes investments of the type
	contemplated by the Regulated Entities typically limits its participation in any one transaction to a specific dollar amount,
	which may be determined by legal or internally imposed limits on exposure in a single investment. In addition, the Code imposes
	diversification requirements on companies, such as the Regulated Entities, which seek certain favorable tax treatment under Subchapter
	M of the Code.

	10

	 In view of the foregoing, in cases when a Regulated Entity Adviser identifies investment opportunities
	requiring larger capital commitments it must seek the participation of other entities with similar investment styles. The availability
	of the Affiliated Funds and/or other Regulated Entities as investing partners of a Regulated Entity may alleviate the necessity
	in certain circumstances.


	 


	Without the opportunity for co-investment,
	each Regulated Entity, acting alone, might have to forego some investment opportunities if the respective Regulated Entity cannot
	provide all of the financing required by a potential portfolio company. Portfolio companies may reject an offer of funding arranged
	by A Regulated Entity Adviser as a result of the Regulated Entity’s inability to commit the entire amount of financing required
	by the portfolio company in a timely manner. By reducing the number of instances in which a Regulated Entity’s individual
	or aggregate investment limits require the Regulated Entity Adviser to arrange a syndicated financing with unaffiliated entities,
	the Regulated Entities likely will be required to forego fewer attractive investment opportunities. With the assets of the Affiliated
	Funds along with the assets of the other Regulated Entities available for co-investment, there should be an increase in the number
	of opportunities accessible to each Regulated Entity.


	 






	 





	10


	See I.R.C. Section 851(b)(3).



	 









	10

	 







	 




	 


	The Regulated Entity Advisers and the Board
	of each of the Regulated Entities believe that it would be desirable for the Regulated Entities to co-invest with other Regulated
	Entities and with the Affiliated Funds, and that such investments would be consistent with the investment objective, investment
	policies, investment positions, investment strategies, investment restrictions, regulatory requirements, and other pertinent factors
	applicable to the Regulated Entities.


	 


	At least quarterly, the Board of each of
	the Regulated Entities will review the rationale for the Co-Investment Program and evaluate whether the program remains important
	to the Regulated Entities.


	 






	2.


	Mechanics of the Co-Investment Program




	 


	In selecting investments for each Regulated
	Entity, the Regulated Entity Advisers will consider the investment objective, investment policies, investment position, capital
	available for investment, and other factors relevant to the respective Regulated Entities they advise. Similarly, in selecting
	investments for the Affiliated Funds, the Affiliated Investment Adviser will choose investments separately for each entity, considering,
	in each case, the investment objective, investment policies, investment position, capital available for investment, and other factors
	relevant to that particular investing entity. The Regulated Entity Advisers expect that any portfolio company that is an appropriate
	investment for a Regulated Entity should also be an appropriate investment for one or more other Regulated Entities and/or one
	or more Affiliated Funds, with certain exceptions based on available capital or diversification. The Regulated Entities, however,
	will not be obligated to invest, or co-invest, when investment opportunities are referred to them.


	 


	The Regulated Entity Adviser, as applicable,
	will present each Proposed Co-Investment Transaction and the proposed allocation of each investment opportunity to the directors
	of the relevant Regulated Entity’s Board that are eligible to vote under Section 57(o) (the “


	Eligible Directors


	”).
	The “required majority,” as defined in Section 57(o) (“


	Required Majority


	”) of a Regulated
	Entity will approve each Co-Investment Transaction prior to any investment by the Regulated Entity. No Independent Director will
	have any direct or indirect financial interest in any Co-Investment Transaction or any interest in any portfolio company, other
	than through an interest (if any) in the securities of the Regulated Entity.


	 


	All subsequent activity (i.e., exits or
	Follow-On Investments) in a Co-Investment Transaction will be made in accordance with the terms and conditions set forth in this
	Application.


	 









	11

	 







	 




	 



	A Regulated
	Entity may participate in a pro rata disposition or Follow-On Investment without obtaining prior approval of the Required Majority
	if, among other things: (i) the proposed participation of each Regulated Entity and Affiliated Fund is proportionate to its outstanding
	investments in the issuer immediately preceding the disposition or Follow-On Investment, as the case may be; and (ii) the board
	of directors of the Regulated Entity has approved that Regulated Entity’s participation in pro rata dispositions and Follow-On
	Investments as being in the best interests of the Regulated Entity. If the Board has not given such approval in advance, any such
	disposition or Follow-On Investment will be submitted to the Regulated Entity’s Eligible Directors.

	The Board of a
	Regulated Entity may at any time rescind, suspend or qualify its approval of pro rata dispositions and Follow-On Investments with
	the result that all dispositions and/or Follow-On Investments must be submitted to the Eligible Directors.


	 


	The Co-Investment Program stipulates that
	the terms, conditions, price, class of securities, settlement date, and registration rights applicable to the applicable Regulated
	Entity’s purchase be the same as those applicable to the purchase by the other Regulated Entities and/or Participating Funds.


	 


	The amount of each Regulated Entity’s
	capital available for investment will be determined based on the amount of cash on hand, existing commitments and reserves, if
	any, the targeted leverage level, targeted asset mix and other investment policies and restrictions set from time to time by the
	Board of the applicable Regulated Entity or imposed by applicable laws, rules, regulations or interpretations. Likewise, an Affiliated
	Fund’s capital available for investment is determined based on the amount of cash on hand, existing commitments and reserves,
	if any, the targeted leverage level, targeted asset mix and other investment policies and restrictions set by the Affiliated Fund’s
	directors, general partners or adviser or imposed by applicable laws, rules, regulations or interpretations.


	 







	B.




	Applicable Law





	 






	1.


	Sections 17(d), 57(a)(4) and 57(i), and Rule 17d-1




	 


	Section 17(d) of the 1940 Act generally prohibits an affiliated person (as defined in Section 2(a)(3) of
	the 1940 Act), or an affiliated person of such affiliated person, of a registered closed-end investment company acting as principal,
	from effecting any transaction in which the registered closed-end investment company is a joint or a joint and several participant,
	in contravention of such rules as the Commission may prescribe for the purpose of limiting or preventing participation by
	the registered closed-end investment company on a basis different from or less advantageous than that of such other participant.
	Rule 17d-1 under the 1940 Act generally prohibits participation by a registered investment company and an affiliated person
	(as defined in Section 2(a)(3) of the 1940 Act) or principal underwriter for that investment company, or an affiliated
	person of such affiliated person or principal underwriter, in any “joint enterprise or other joint arrangement or profit-sharing
	plan,” as defined in the rule, without prior approval by the Commission by order upon application.


	 


	Similarly, with regard
	to BDCs, Section 57(a)(4) makes it unlawful for any person who is related to a BDC in a manner described in
	Section 57(b), acting as principal, knowingly to effect any transaction in which the BDC or a company controlled by such
	BDC is a joint or a joint and several participant with that person in contravention of rules and regulations as the
	Commission may prescribe for the purpose of limiting or preventing participation by the BDC or controlled company on a basis
	less advantageous than that of the other participant. Although the Commission has not adopted any rules expressly under
	Section 57(a)(4), Section 57(i) provides that the rules under Section 17(d) applicable to registered
	closed-end investment companies (

	e.g.

	, Rule 17d-1) are, in the interim, deemed to apply to transactions subject
	to Section 57(a). Rule 17d-1, as made applicable to BDCs by Section 57(i), prohibits any person who is related
	to a BDC in a manner described in Section 57(b), as modified by Rule 57b-1, acting as principal, from participating
	in, or effecting any transaction in connection with, any joint enterprise or other joint arrangement or profit-sharing plan
	in which the BDC or a company controlled by such BDC is a participant, unless an application regarding the joint enterprise,
	arrangement, or profit-sharing plan has been filed with the Commission and has been granted by an order entered prior to the
	submission of the plan or any modification thereof to security holders for approval, or prior to its adoption or modification
	if not so submitted.


	 









	12

	 







	 




	 


	In passing upon applications under Rule 17d-1,
	the Commission will consider whether the participation by the BDC or controlled company in such joint transaction is consistent
	with the provisions, policies, and purposes of the Act and the extent to which such participation is on a basis different from
	or less advantageous than that of other participants.


	 






	2.


	Section 57(b) and Rule 57b-1




	 


	Section 57(b), as modified by Rule 57b-1,
	specifies the persons to whom the prohibitions of Section 57(a)(4) apply. These persons include the following: (1) any
	director, officer, employee, or member of an advisory board of a BDC or any person (other than the BDC itself) who is, within the
	meaning of Section 2(a)(3)(C), an affiliated person of any such person; or (2) any investment adviser or promoter of,
	general partner in, principal underwriter for, or person directly or indirectly either controlling, controlled by, or under common
	control with a BDC (except the BDC itself and any person who, if it were not directly or indirectly controlled by the BDC, would
	not be directly or indirectly under the control of a person who controls the BDC), or any person who is, within the meaning of
	Section 2(a)(3)(C) or (D), an affiliated person of such person.


	 


	Rule 57b-1 exempts certain persons
	otherwise related to a BDC in a manner described in Section 57(b)(2) from being subject to the prohibitions of Section 57(a). Specifically,
	this rule states that the provisions of Section 57(a) shall not apply to any person: (a) solely because that person
	is directly or indirectly controlled by a BDC; or (b) solely because that person is directly or indirectly controlling, controlled
	by, or under common control with, a person described in (a) of the rule or is an officer, director, partner, copartner, or
	employee of a person described in (a) of the rule.


	 


	Section 2(a)(9) defines “control”
	as the power to exercise a controlling influence over the management or policies of a company, unless such power is solely the
	result of an official position with such company. The statute also sets forth the interpretation that any person who owns
	beneficially, either directly or through one or more controlled companies, more than 25 percent of the voting securities of a company
	shall be presumed to control such company; any person who does not so own more than 25 percent of the voting securities of a company
	shall be presumed not to control such company; and a natural person shall be presumed not to be a controlled person.


	 


	Sections 2(a)(3)(C) and (D) define
	an “affiliated person” of another person as: (C) any person directly or indirectly controlling, controlled
	by, or under common control with, such other person; and (D) any officer, director, partner, copartner, or employee of such
	other person.


	 









	13

	 







	 




	 







	C.




	Need for Relief





	 


	Co-Investment Transactions may
	be prohibited by Sections 17(d) and/or 57(a)(4) and Rule 17d-1 without a prior order of the Commission to the extent
	that the Affiliated Funds and the other Regulated Entities fall within the category of persons described by
	Section 17(d) and Section 57(b), as modified by Rule 57b-1 thereunder, vis-à-vis each Regulated Entity.


	 


	First, the Regulated Entities and the Affiliated
	Funds may be deemed to be affiliated persons within the meaning of Section 2(a)(3). An Existing Affiliated Investment Adviser
	is the investment adviser to each of the Affiliated Funds. A Regulated Entity Investment Adviser is the investment adviser to each
	of the Regulated Entities. The Existing Affiliated Investment Advisers and the Regulated Entity Advisers are each under the common
	control of Medley LLC. To the extent that the Regulated Entities and the Affiliated Funds may be deemed to be controlled by or
	under the common control with the Regulated Entity Advisers, the Regulated Entities and the Affiliated Funds may be deemed affiliated
	persons within the meaning of Section 2(a)(3).


	 


	Second, each Regulated Entity may be deemed
	to be affiliated persons of each other Regulated Entity within the meaning of Section 2(a)(3). A Regulated Entity Adviser
	is the investment adviser to each of the Regulated Entities. To the extent that a Regulated Entity may be deemed to be controlled
	by or under common control with each of the Regulated Entity Advisers, each Regulated Entity may be deemed affiliated persons of
	each other Regulated Entity within the meaning of Section 2(a)(3).


	 







	D.




	Requested Relief





	 


	Accordingly, Applicants respectfully request
	an Order of the Commission, pursuant to Sections 17(d) and 57(i) and Rule 17d-1, permitting (a) the Existing
	Affiliated Funds, and any Future Affiliated Funds, to participate with one or more Regulated Entities in Co-Investment Transactions,
	and (b) the Regulated Entities to participate in Co-Investment Transactions with each other.


	 







	E.




	Precedents





	 


	The Commission has granted co-investment
	relief on numerous occasions in recent years.

	11

	 Applicants submit that the formulae and procedures set forth as conditions
	for the relief requested herein are consistent with the range of investor protection found in the cited orders. We note,
	in particular, that the co-investment protocol to be followed by the Applicants here is substantially similar to the protocol
	followed by Medley Capital Corporation and its affiliates, for which an order was granted on November 25, 2013.

	12

	 We also note that
	the Commission has granted co-investment relief to permit a BDC and its SBIC subsidiary to co-invest with another fund.

	12



	 




	 








	11

	See,
	e.g.,


	OHA Investment Corporation, et al.

	(File No. 812-14482) Release No. IC-32094 (April 25, 2016) (order), Release
	No. IC-32061 (March 30, 2016) (notice);

	NexPoint Capital, Inc., et al.

	(File No. 812-14430) Release No. IC-32078 (April
	29, 2016) (order), Release No. IC-32048 (March 24, 2016) (notice); 

	Crescent Capital BDC Inc., et al.

	(File No. 812-14454)
	Release No. IC-32056 (March 29, 2012) (order), Release No. IC-32018 (March 2, 2016) (notice)

	Alcentra Capital Corporation,
	et al.


	 

	(File No. 812-14374)
	Release No. IC-31951 (December 30, 2015) (order), Release No. IC-31927 (December 4, 2015) (notice);

	 


	Harvest
	Capital Credit Corporation, et al.


	 

	(File No. 812-14365)
	Release No. IC-31930 (December 10, 2015) (order), Release No. IC-31860 (October 5, 2015) (notice);

	THL
	Credit, Inc., et al.


	 

	(File No. 812-14256),
	Release No. IC-31929 (December 8, 2015) (order), Release No. IC-31899 (November 10, 2015) (notice);

	 


	Full
	Circle Capital Corporation, et al.


	 

	(File No. 812-14396)
	Release No. IC-31837 (September 23, 2015) (order), Release No. IC-31799 (August 28, 2015) (notice);

	 


	Business
	Development Corporation of America, et al.


	 

	(File No. 812-14368)
	Release No. IC-31738 (August 5, 2015) (order), Release No. IC-31598 (May 11, 2015) (notice);

	 


	Benefit
	Street Partners BDC, Inc., et al

	. (File No. 812-14126) Release No. IC-31686 (June 23, 2015) (order), Release
	No. IC- 31651 (May 27, 2015) (notice);

	 


	TCW Direct
	Lending LLC, et al.


	 

	(File No. 812-14382) Release
	No. IC-31649 (May 27, 2015) (order), Release No. IC-31589 (April 30, 2015) (notice);

	 


	Garrison
	Capital Inc., et al.


	 

	(File No. 812-14097) Release
	No. IC-31409 (January 12, 2015) (order), Release No. IC-31373 (December 15, 2014) (notice);

	Medley Capital
	Corporation, et al.

	(File No. 812-14020), Release No. IC-30807 (November 25, 2013) (order), Release No. IC-30769 (October
	28, 2013) (notice).











	12

	Main Street Capital Corporation et. al., Investment
	Company Act Release Nos. 28265 (May 8, 2008) (notice) and 28295 (June 3, 2008) (order).




	 









	14

	 







	 




	 







	F.




	Applicants’ Legal Arguments





	 


	Rule 17d-1 was promulgated by the
	Commission pursuant to Section 17(d) and made applicable to BDCs by Section 57(i). Paragraph (a) of Rule 17d-1
	permits an otherwise prohibited person, acting as principal, to participate in, or effect a transaction in connection with, a joint
	enterprise or other joint arrangement or profit-sharing plan in which a BDC is a participant if an application regarding the joint
	enterprise, arrangement, or profit-sharing plan has been filed with the Commission and has been granted by an order issued prior
	to the submission of such plan or any modification thereof to security holders for approval, or prior to its adoption or modification
	if not so submitted. Paragraph (b) of Rule 17d-1 states that in passing upon applications under that rule, the Commission
	will consider whether the participation by the investment company in such joint enterprise, joint arrangement, or profit-sharing
	plan on the basis proposed is consistent with the provisions, policies, and purposes of the Act and the extent to which such participation
	is on a basis different from or less advantageous than that of other participants.


	 


	Applicants submit that the fact that the
	Required Majority of each Regulated Entity will approve each Co-Investment Transaction before the investment is made, and other
	protective conditions set forth in this Application will ensure that the Regulated Entities will be treated fairly. Each Regulated
	Entity would have the ability to engage in Follow-On Investments in a fair manner consistent with the protections of the other
	conditions.


	 


	If the Regulated Entity Advisers or
	the Principals, or any person controlling, controlled by, or under common control with the Regulated Entity Advisers or the
	Principals, and the Affiliated Funds (collectively, the “


	Holders


	”) own in the aggregate more than
	25 percent of the outstanding voting shares of a Regulated Entity (the “


	Shares


	”), then the Holders
	will vote such Shares as directed by an independent third party when voting on (1) the election of
	directors; (2) the removal of one or more directors; or (3) any other matter under either the Act or applicable
	state law affecting the Board’s composition, size or manner of election.


	 


	Applicants believe that this condition
	will ensure that the Independent Directors will act independently in evaluating the Co-Investment Program, because the ability
	of the Regulated Entity Advisers or the Principals to influence the Independent Directors by a suggestion, explicit or implied,
	that the Independent Directors can be removed will be limited significantly. The Independent Directors shall evaluate and approve
	any independent third party, taking into account its qualifications, reputation for independence, cost to the shareholders,
	and other factors that they deem relevant.


	 









	15

	 







	 




	 


	The conditions to which the
	requested relief will be subject are designed to ensure that the Regulated Entity Advisers, the Affiliated Investment
	Advisers or the Principals would not be able to favor the Affiliated Funds over the Regulated Entities (or one Regulated
	Entity over another) through the allocation of investment opportunities among them. 

	To
	the extent there is an investment that falls within the Objectives and Strategies of a Regulated Entity and one or more other
	Regulated Entities and/or the investment objectives and strategies of one or more Affiliated Funds, it is expected that a
	Regulated Entity will co-invest with one or more other Regulated Entities and/or one or more Affiliated Funds, with certain
	exceptions based on available capital or diversification. The Regulated Entities, however, will not be obligated to invest,
	or co-invest, when investment opportunities are referred to them.

	Applicants submit that the Co-Investment Program
	presents an attractive alternative to the institution of some form of equitable allocation protocol for the allocation of
	100% of individual investment opportunities to either one Regulated Entity or the Affiliated Funds as opportunities
	arise.


	 


	Applicants submit that the Regulated Entities’
	participation in the Co-Investment Transactions will be consistent with the provisions, policies, and purposes of the Act and on
	a basis that is not different from or less advantageous than that of other participants. Applicants believe that the conditions
	will ensure that the Regulated Entity Advisers, the Affiliated Investment Advisers and the Principals would not be able to favor
	the Affiliated Funds over the Regulated Entities (or one Regulated Entity over another) through the allocation of investment opportunities
	among them because, as a guiding principle, the conditions permit a co-investment transaction only if the Eligible Directors have
	made a determination that the proposed investment would not benefit an affiliated person other than the fund participating in the
	transaction and then only to the extent strictly permitted by the conditions.


	 




	After making the determinations required
	in conditions 1 and 2(a), other than in the case of pro rata dispositions and Follow-On Investments as provided for in conditions
	7 and 8, the applicable Regulated Entity Adviser will present each Potential Co-Investment Transaction and the proposed allocation
	to the Eligible Directors, and the Required Majority will approve each Co-Investment Transaction prior to any investment by the
	Regulated Entity.


	 



	Applicants
	believe that participation by the Regulated Entities in pro rata dispositions and Follow-On Investments, as provided in conditions
	7 and 8, is consistent with the provisions, policies and purposes of the Act and will not be made on a basis different from or
	less advantageous than that of other participants. A formulaic approach, such as pro rata dispositions and Follow-On Investments,
	eliminates the discretionary ability to make allocation determinations, and in turn eliminates the possibility for overreaching
	and promotes fairness. 



	 







	G.




	Conditions





	 


	Applicants agree that any order of the
	Commission granting the requested relief will be subject to the following conditions:


	 


	1. Each time a Regulated Entity Adviser
	or an Affiliated Investment Adviser considers a Potential Co-Investment Transaction for an Affiliated Fund or another Regulated
	Entity that falls within the then-current Objectives and Strategies of a Regulated Entity,

	13

	 the appropriate Regulated
	Entity Adviser will make an independent determination of the appropriateness of the investment for the Regulated Entity in light
	of the Regulated Entity’s then-current circumstances.


	 


	2. (a) If a Regulated Entity Adviser deems
	a Regulated Entity’s participation in any Potential Co-Investment Transaction to be appropriate for such Regulated Entity,
	it will then determine an appropriate level of investment for such Regulated Entity.



	 



	(b) If the aggregate amount recommended
	by Regulated Entity Advisers to be invested by the Regulated Entities in such Potential Co-Investment Transaction, together with
	the amount proposed to be invested by each Participating Fund, collectively, in the same transaction, exceeds the amount of the
	investment opportunity, the amount proposed to be invested by each such party will be allocated among them 

	pro rata

	 based
	on each participating party’s capital available for investment in the asset class being allocated, up to the amount proposed
	to be invested by each. The Regulated Entity Advisers will provide the respective Eligible Directors with information concerning
	each party’s available capital to assist the Eligible Directors with their review of such Regulated Entity’s investments
	for compliance with these allocation procedures.


	 






	 





	13


	“


	Objectives and Strategies


	” means the Regulated Entity’s investment objectives and strategies,
	as described in the Regulated Entity’s registration statement on Form N-2, other filings the Regulated Entity has made with
	the Commission under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the “1933 Act”), or under the Securities Exchange Act
	of 1934, as amended, and the Regulated Entity’s reports to stockholders.



	 









	16

	 







	 




	 


	(c) After making the determinations required
	in conditions 1 and 2(a), the Regulated Entity Advisers will distribute written information concerning the Potential Co-Investment
	Transaction, including the amount proposed to be invested by each Regulated Entity and any Participating Fund, to the Eligible
	Directors of the each participating Regulated Entity for their consideration. A Regulated Entity will co-invest with another Regulated
	Entity and/or any Participating Fund only if, prior to participating in the Potential Co-Investment Transaction, a Required Majority
	of the Regulated Entity concludes that:


	 


	(i)

	the terms
	of the transaction, including the consideration to be paid, are reasonable and fair to the Regulated Entity and its stockholders
	and do not involve overreaching in respect of the Regulated Entity or its stockholders on the part of any person concerned

	;


	 


	(ii)
	the transaction is consistent with


	 


	(A)
	the interests of the Regulated Entity’s stockholders; and


	 


	(B) the Regulated Entity’s
	then-current Objectives and Strategies.


	 


	(iii) the investment by another Regulated
	Entity or one or more Participating Funds would not disadvantage the Regulated Entity, and participation by such Regulated Entity
	is not on a basis different from or less advantageous than that of any Participating Fund or other Regulated Entity; 

	provided

	that, if any Participating Fund or other Regulated Entity, but not the Regulated Entity itself, gains the right to nominate
	a director for election to a portfolio company’s board of directors or the right to have a board observer or any similar
	right to participate in the governance or management of the portfolio company, such event shall not be interpreted to prohibit
	the Required Majority from reaching the conclusions required by this condition (2)(c)(iii), if


	 


	(A) the Eligible Directors shall
	have the right to ratify the selection of such director or board observer, if any;


	 


	(B) the Regulated Entity Adviser
	agrees to, and does, provide periodic reports to the Board of the applicable Regulated Entity with respect to the actions of such
	director or the information received by such board observer or obtained through the exercise of any similar right to participate
	in the governance or management of the portfolio company; and


	 


	(C) any fees or other compensation
	that any other Regulated Entity or any Participating Fund or any affiliated person of either receives in connection with the right
	of a Participating Fund or other Regulated Entity to nominate a director or appoint a board observer or otherwise to participate
	in the governance or management of the portfolio company will be shared proportionately among any Participating Funds (who may,
	in turn, share their portion with their affiliated persons) and the participating Regulated Entities in accordance with the amount
	of each party’s investment; and


	 









	17

	 







	 




	 


	(iv) the proposed investment by the Regulated
	Entity will not benefit the Regulated Entity Advisers, the Affiliated Funds or other Regulated Entities, or any affiliated person
	of any of them (other than the other parties to the Co-Investment Transaction), except (a) to the extent permitted by condition
	13; (b) to the extent permitted by Sections 17(e) or 57(k), as applicable; (c) indirectly, as a result of an interest
	in securities issued by one of the parties to the Co-Investment Transaction; or (d) in the case of fees or other compensation
	described in condition 2(c)(iii)(C).


	 


	3. Each Regulated Entity has the right
	to decline to participate in any Potential Co-Investment Transaction or to invest less than the amount proposed.


	 


	4. The Regulated Entity Advisers will present
	to the Board of each Regulated Entity, as applicable, on a quarterly basis, a record of all investments in Potential Co-Investment
	Transactions made by the Affiliated Funds and other Regulated Entities during the preceding quarter that fell within the Regulated
	Entity’s then-current Objectives and Strategies that were not made available to the respective Regulated Entity, and an explanation
	of why the investment opportunities were not offered to the Regulated Entity. All information presented to the Board pursuant
	to this condition will be kept for the life of the Regulated Entity and at least two years thereafter, and will be subject to examination
	by the Commission and its staff.


	 


	5. Except for Follow-On Investments made
	pursuant to condition 8 below

	14

	, a Regulated Entity will not invest in reliance on the Order in any portfolio company
	in which any other Regulated Entity, any Affiliated Fund, or any affiliated person of any other Regulated Entity or Affiliated
	Fund is an existing investor.


	 


	6. A Regulated Entity will not participate
	in any Potential Co-Investment Transaction unless the terms, conditions, price, class of securities to be purchased, settlement
	date and registration rights will be the same for such Regulated Entity as for the Participating Funds and/or other Regulated Entities.
	The grant to an Affiliated Fund or another Regulated Entity, but not such Regulated Entity, of the right to nominate a director
	for election to a portfolio company’s board of directors, the right to have an observer on the board of directors or similar
	rights to participate in the governance or management of the portfolio company will not be interpreted so as to violate this condition
	6, if conditions 2(c)(iii)(A), (B) and (C) are met.


	 


	7. (a) If any Regulated Entity or Participating
	Fund elects to sell, exchange, or otherwise dispose of an interest in a security that was acquired in a Co-Investment Transaction,
	then:


	 


	(i) the investment adviser to such Regulated
	Entity or Participating Fund will notify each other Regulated Entity that participated in the Co-Investment Transaction of the
	proposed disposition at the earliest practical time; and


	 






	 







	14

	This exception applies only to Follow-On Investments
	by a Regulated Entity in issuers in which that Regulated Entity already holds investments. 


	 









	18

	 







	 




	 


	(ii) the investment adviser to each other
	Regulated Entity that participated in the Co-Investment Transaction will formulate a recommendation as to participation by such
	Regulated Entity in the disposition.


	 


	(b) Each Regulated Entity will have the
	right to participate in such disposition on a proportionate basis, at the same price and on the same terms and conditions as those
	applicable to any Participating Funds and any other Regulated Entities.


	 


	(c) A Regulated Entity
	may participate in such disposition without obtaining prior approval of the Required Majority if: (i) the
	proposed participation of each Regulated Entity and the Participating Funds in such disposition is proportionate to its
	outstanding investments in the issuer immediately preceding the disposition; (ii) the Board of the applicable Regulated
	Entity has approved as being in the best interests of the applicable Regulated Entity the ability to participate in such
	dispositions on a 

	pro rata

	 basis (as described in greater detail in this Application); and (iii) the
	Board of the applicable Regulated Entity is provided on a quarterly basis with a list of all Follow-On Investments made in accordance with this condition. In all other cases, the applicable Regulated Entity Adviser will provide
	its written recommendation as to such Regulated Entity’s participation to the Eligible Directors, and such Regulated
	Entity will participate in such disposition solely to the extent that a Required Majority determines that it is in such
	Regulated Entity’s best interests.


	 


	(d) Each Regulated Entity and each of the
	Participating Funds will bear its own expenses in connection with any such disposition.


	 


	8. (a) If any Regulated Entity or Participating
	Fund desires to make a Follow-On Investment in a portfolio company whose securities were acquired in a Co-Investment Transaction,
	then:


	 


	(i) the investment adviser to such Regulated
	Entity or Participating Fund will notify each other Regulated Entity that participated in the Co-Investment Transaction of the
	proposed transaction at the earliest practical time; and


	 


	(ii) the investment adviser to each other
	Regulated Entity that participated in the Co-Investment Transaction will formulate a recommendation as to the proposed participation,
	including the amount of the proposed investment, by such Regulated Entity.


	 


	(b) A Regulated Entity may
	participate in such Follow-On Investment without obtaining prior approval of the Required Majority if: (i) the proposed
	participation of each Regulated Entity and Participating Fund in such investment is proportionate to its outstanding
	investments in the issuer immediately preceding the Follow-On Investment; (ii) the Board of the applicable Regulated
	Entity has approved as being in the best interests of such Regulated Entity the ability to participate in Follow-On
	Investments on a pro rata basis (as described in greater detail in this Application); and (iii) the Board of the applicable Regulated Entity is provided on a quarterly
	basis with a list of all dispositions made in accordance with this condition. In all other cases, the
	applicable Regulated Entity Adviser will provide its written recommendation as to such Regulated Entity’s participation
	to the Eligible Directors, and such Regulated Entity will participate in such follow-on investment solely to the extent that
	a Required Majority determines that it is in such Regulated Entity’s best interests.


	 









	19

	 







	 




	 


	(c) If, with respect to any follow-on
	investment:


	 


	(i) the amount of the opportunity is not
	based on the Regulated Entities’ and the Participating Funds’ outstanding investments immediately preceding the follow-on
	investment; and


	 


	(ii) the aggregate amount recommended
	by the applicable Regulated Entity Adviser to be invested by each Regulated Entity in such Co-Investment Transaction, together
	with the amount proposed to be invested by the Participating Funds and/or other Regulated Entity, collectively, in the same transaction,
	exceeds the amount of the investment opportunity, then the amount to be invested by each such party will be allocated among them 

	pro
	rata

	 based on each party’s capital available for investment in the asset class being allocated, up to the amount
	proposed to be invested by each.


	 


	(d) The acquisition of Follow-On Investments as permitted by this condition will be considered
	a Co-Investment Transaction for all purposes and be subject to the other conditions set forth in the Application.


	 


	9. The Independent Directors of each Regulated
	Entity will be provided quarterly for review all information concerning Potential Co-Investment Transactions and Co-Investment
	Transactions, including investments made by other Regulated Entities or Affiliated Funds that the Regulated Entity considered
	but declined to participate in, so that the Independent Directors may determine whether all investments made during the preceding
	quarter, including those investments that the Regulated Entity considered but declined to participate in, comply with the conditions
	of the Order. In addition, the Independent Directors will consider at least annually the continued appropriateness for
	the Regulated Entities of participating in new and existing Co-Investment Transactions.


	 


	10.

	Each Regulated
	Entity will maintain the records required by section 57(f)(3) as if each of the Regulated Entities were a BDC and each of the
	investments permitted under these conditions were approved by the Required Majority under section 57(f).




	 




	11. No Independent
	Director of a Regulated Entity will also be a director, general partner, managing member or principal, or otherwise an “affiliated
	person” (as defined in the Act) of, any of the Affiliated Funds.




	 




	12. The expenses,
	if any, associated with acquiring, holding or disposing of any securities acquired in a Co-Investment Transaction (including,
	without limitation, the expenses of the distribution of any such securities registered for sale under the 1933 Act) shall, to
	the extent not payable by the Regulated Entity Advisers or the Affiliated Investment Advisers under their respective investment
	advisory agreements with the Regulated Entities and the Participating Funds, be shared by the applicable Regulated Entities and
	the Participating Funds in proportion to the relative amounts of their securities held or being acquired or disposed of, as the
	case may be.




	 










	20

	 







	 




	 



	13. Any
	transaction fee (including break-up or commitment fees but excluding brokers’ fees contemplated by
	Section 57(k)(2) or 17(e)(2), as applicable) received in connection with a Co-Investment Transaction will be distributed
	to the applicable Regulated Entities and the Participating Funds on a 

	pro rata

	 basis based on the amounts
	each invested or committed, as the case may be, in such Co-Investment Transaction. If any transaction fee is to be held by a
	Regulated Entity Adviser or an Affiliated Investment Adviser pending consummation of the transaction, the fee will be
	deposited into an account maintained by the Regulated Entity Adviser or such other adviser, as the case may be, at a bank or
	banks having the qualifications prescribed in Section 26(a)(1), and the account will earn a competitive rate of interest
	that will also be divided 

	pro rata 

	among each applicable Regulated Entity and each Participating Fund based
	on the amount each invests in such Co-Investment Transaction. None of the Affiliated Funds, Regulated Entity Advisers,
	Affiliated Investment Advisers, or any affiliated person of any of the Regulated Entities will receive additional
	compensation or remuneration of any kind (other than (a) in the case of the Regulated Entities and the Participating
	Funds, the 

	pro rata

	transaction fees described above and fees or other compensation described in
	condition 2(c)(iii)(C) and (b) in the case of the Regulated Entity Advisers and the Affiliated Advisers, investment
	advisory fees paid in accordance with the Regulated Entities’ and Affiliated Funds’ governing agreements) as a
	result of or in connection with a Co-Investment Transaction.



	 


	14. If the Regulated Entity Advisers,
	the Principals, any person controlling, controlled by, or under common control with the Regulated Entity Advisers or the Principals,
	and the Affiliated Funds (collectively, the “


	Holders


	”) own in the aggregate more than 25% of the outstanding
	voting securities of a Regulated Entity (“


	Shares


	”), then the Holders will vote such Shares as directed
	by an independent third party when voting on (1) the election
	of directors; (2) the removal of one or more directors; or (3) any other matter under either the Act or applicable state
	law affecting the Board’s composition, size or manner of election.


	 


	15.

	The Regulated
	Entity Advisers and the Affiliated Investment Advisers will maintain written policies and procedures reasonably designed to ensure
	compliance with the foregoing conditions. These policies and procedures will require, among other things, that each Regulated
	Entity Adviser will be notified of all Potential Co-Investment Transactions that fall within the then-current Objectives and Strategies
	of any Regulated Entity it advises and will be given sufficient information to make its independent determination and recommendations
	under conditions 1, 2(a), 7 and 8.












	21

	 







	 




	 




	III. PROCEDURAL MATTERS




	 







	A.




	Communications





	 


	Please address all communications concerning
	this Application and the Notice and Order to:


	 


	Brook Taube


	Medley Capital Corporation


	Seth Taube


	Sierra Income Corporation

	Sierra Total Return Fund


	280 Park Avenue, 6

	th

	Floor East


	New York, NY 10017


	(212) 759-0777


	 


	Please address any questions, and a copy
	of any communications, concerning this Application, the Notice and Order to:


	 


	Steven B. Boehm, Esq.


	Harry S. Pangas, Esq.


	Payam Siadatpour, Esq.


	Sutherland Asbill & Brennan LLP


	700 6

	th

	Street, N.W.


	Washington, DC 20001


	(202) 383-0100


	 







	B.




	Authorization





	 


	Pursuant to Rule 0-2(c) under
	the Act, Applicants hereby state that each of MCC, Sierra and STRF, by resolution duly adopted on July 21, 2016 (attached
	hereto as Exhibits A, B and C), have authorized to cause to be prepared and to execute and file with the Commission
	this Application and any amendment thereto under Sections 17(d) and 57(i) of the Act and Rule 17d-1 under the Act, for an
	order permitting certain joint transactions that may otherwise be prohibited under Sections 17(d) and 57(a)(4) of
	such Act. Each person executing the application on behalf of the Applicants says that he has duly executed the
	Application for and on behalf of the Applicants; that he is authorized to execute the Application pursuant to the terms of an
	operating agreement, management agreement or otherwise; and that all actions by members, directors or other bodies necessary
	to authorize each such deponent to execute and file the Application have been taken.


	 


	All requirements for the execution
	and filing of this Application in the name of and on behalf of each Applicant by the undersigned have been complied with and
	the undersigned is fully authorized to do so and has duly executed this Application this 26

	th

	day of July,
	2016.


	 









	22

	 







	 




	 




	 



	MEDLEY CAPITAL CORPORATION





	 


	 


	 




	 



	By:




	/s/ Brook Taube





	 


	 



	Name: Brook Taube





	 


	 



	Title: Chief Executive Officer





	 




	 



	MEDLEY LLC





	 


	 


	 




	 



	By:




	/s/ Brook Taube





	 


	 



	Name: Brook Taube





	 


	 



	Title: Manager





	 






	 



	MCC ADVISORS LLC





	 


	 


	 




	 



	By:




	/s/ Brook Taube





	 


	 



	Name: Brook Taube





	 


	 



	Title: Manager





	 






	 





	MEDLEY CAPITAL LLC,
	MEDLEY

	OPPORTUNITY FUND II LP, MOF II

	GP LLC, MEDLEY OPPORTUNITY

	FUND III LP, MOF III GP LLC, MOF II

	MANAGEMENT LLC, MOF III

	MANAGEMENT LLC, MEDLEY SBIC,


	LP, MEDLEY SBIC
	GP, LLC, SIERRA


	TOTAL RETURN FUND, MEDLEY


	CREDIT STRATEGIES (KOC) LLC,


	STRF ADVISORS LLC







	 









	23

	 







	 




	 




	 



	By:




	/s/ Brook Taube





	 


	 



	Name: Brook Taube





	 


	 



	Authorized Person





	 




	 



	SIERRA INCOME CORPORATION





	 


	 


	 




	 



	By:




	/s/ Seth Taube





	 


	 



	Name: Seth Taube





	 


	 



	Title: Chief Executive Officer





	 




	 



	SIC ADVISORS LLC





	 


	 


	 




	 



	By:




	/s/ Richard T. Allorto, Jr.





	 


	 



	Name: Richard T. Allorto, Jr.





	 


	 



	Title: Chief Financial Officer





	 


	 


	 




	 


	SIERRA TOTAL RETURN FUND




	 


	 


	 




	 


	By:


	/s/ Seth Taube




	 


	 


	Name: Seth Taube




	 


	 


	Title: Chief Executive Officer




	 


	 


	 




	 


	STRF ADVISORS LLC




	 


	 


	/s/ Richard T. Allorto, Jr.




	 


	 


	Name: Richard T. Allorto, Jr.




	 


	 


	Title: Chief Financial Officer




	 


	 


	 













	24

	 







	 




	 



	VERIFICATION



	 


	The undersigned states that he has duly executed the foregoing Application, dated as of the date first above written, for and on behalf of the Applicants, as the
	case may be, that he holds the office with such entity as indicated below and that all action by the directors, stockholders, general
	partners, trustees or members of each entity, as applicable, necessary to authorize the undersigned to execute and file such instrument
	has been taken. The undersigned further states that he is familiar with such instrument and the contents thereof and that
	the facts set forth therein are true to the best of his knowledge, information and belief.


	 






	 



	MEDLEY CAPITAL CORPORATION





	 


	 


	 




	 



	By:




	/s/ Brook Taube





	 


	 



	Name: Brook Taube





	 


	 



	Title: Chief Executive Officer





	 


	 


	 




	 



	MEDLEY LLC





	 


	 


	 




	 



	By:




	/s/ Brook Taube





	 


	 



	Name: Brook Taube





	 


	 



	Title: Manager





	 


	 


	 




	 



	MCC ADVISORS LLC





	 


	 


	 




	 



	By:




	/s/ Brook Taube





	 


	 



	Name: Brook Taube





	 


	 



	Title: Manager





	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 




	 




	 









	25

	 







	 




	 




	 



	MEDLEY CAPITAL LLC,
	MEDLEY

	OPPORTUNITY FUND II LP, MOF II

	GP LLC, MEDLEY OPPORTUNITY

	FUND III LP, MOF III GP LLC, MOF II

	MANAGEMENT LLC, MOF III

	MANAGEMENT LLC, MEDLEY SBIC,


	LP, MEDLEY SBIC
	GP, LLC, SIERRA


	TOTAL RETURN FUND, MEDLEY


	CREDIT STRATEGIES (KOC) LLC,


	STRF ADVISORS LLC





	 


	 


	 




	 



	By:




	/s/ Brook Taube





	 


	 



	Name: Brook Taube





	 


	 



	Authorized Person





	 


	 


	 




	 



	SIERRA INCOME CORPORATION





	 


	 


	 




	 



	By:




	/s/ Seth Taube





	 


	 



	Name: Seth Taube





	 


	 



	Title: Chief Executive Officer





	 


	 


	 




	 



	SIC ADVISORS, LLC





	 


	 


	 




	 



	By:




	/s/ Richard T. Allorto, Jr.





	 


	 



	Name: Richard T. Allorto, Jr.





	 


	 



	Title: Chief Financial Officer





	 


	 


	 




	 


	SIERRA TOTAL RETURN FUND




	 


	 


	 




	 


	By:


	/s/ Seth Taube




	 


	 


	Name: Seth Taube




	 


	 


	Title: Chief Executive Officer




	 


	 


	 




	 


	STRF ADVISORS, LLC




	 


	 


	/s/ Richard T. Allorto, Jr.




	 


	 


	Name: Richard T. Allorto, Jr.




	 


	 


	Title: Chief Financial Officer




	 









	26

	 







	 




	 


	EXHIBIT A



	Resolution of the Board of Directors
	of




	MEDLEY CAPITAL CORPORATION



	 





	WHEREAS

	, the U.S. Securities and
	Exchange Commission (the “


	SEC


	”) granted the Company an exemptive order on November 25, 2013 (the “


	Prior
	Order


	”) pursuant to Sections 57(a)(4) and 57(i) and Rule 17d-1 permitting certain joint transactions that otherwise
	may be prohibited by Section 57(a)(4);


	 



	WHEREAS

	, management
	of the Company believes that it would be in the Company’s best interest to expand the scope of the Prior Order to allow the
	Company to enter into co-investment transactions with investment companies that are registered under the Investment Company Act
	of 1940, as amended (the “


	1940 Act


	”) and whose investment adviser is MCC Advisors, (ii) SIC Advisors,
	or (iii) any future investment adviser that Medley LLC controls, in addition to the existing and future business development companies
	and private funds currently covered by the Prior Order, and had such an expanded application prepared by counsel (the


	“New
	Exemptive Application”


	);


	 



	WHEREAS

	, the
	Board has reviewed the New Exemptive Application, a copy of which is attached hereto as Exhibit A, for an order of the SEC (the


	“New Order”


	) pursuant to Sections 17(d) and 57(i) of the 1940 Act, and Rule 17d-1 promulgated under the
	1940 Act, permitting certain joint transactions that otherwise may be prohibited by either or both of Sections 17(d) and 57(a)(4);


	 



	WHEREAS,

	the Board deems it advisable
	and in the best interest of the Company that the Company file the New Exemptive Application; and


	 



	WHEREAS

	, the
	Company will continue to rely on the Prior Order until the SEC issues the New Order, at which point the Company will cease relying
	on the Prior Order;


	 



	NOW, THEREFORE,
	BE IT RESOLVED

	, that the officers, shall be, and each of them individually hereby is, authorized, empowered and directed, in
	the name and on behalf of the Company, to cause to be executed, delivered and filed with the SEC the New Exemptive Application,
	in substantially the form attached hereto as Exhibit A;



	 




	FURTHER RESOLVED

	,
	that the officers shall be, and each of them individually hereby is, authorized, empowered and directed, in the name and on behalf
	of the Company, to cause to be made, executed, delivered and filed with the SEC any amendments to the New Exemptive Application
	and any additional applications for exemptive relief as are determined necessary, advisable or appropriate by any of the officers
	in order to effectuate the foregoing resolutions, such determination to be conclusively evidenced by the taking of any such action;



	 




	FURTHER RESOLVED

	,
	that all acts and things previously done by any of the officers, on or prior to the date hereof, in the name and on behalf of the
	Company in connection with the foregoing resolutions are in all respects authorized, ratified, approved, confirmed and adopted
	as the acts and deeds by and on behalf of the Company; and


	 



	FURTHER RESOLVED

	,
	that the officers be, and each of them hereby is, authorized, empowered and directed to certify and deliver copies of these resolutions
	to such governmental bodies, agencies, persons, firms or corporations as the officers may deem necessary and to identify by his
	or her signature or certificate, or in such form as may be required, the documents and instruments presented to and approved herein
	and to furnish evidence of the approval, by an officer authorized to give such approval, of any document, instrument or provision
	or any addition, deletion or change in any document or instrument.


	 


	(Adopted on July 21, 2016)


	 




	 









	27

	 







	 






	 


	EXHIBIT B



	Resolution of the Board of Directors
	of




	SIERRA INCOME CORPORATION



	 





	WHEREAS

	, the U.S. Securities and
	Exchange Commission (the “


	SEC


	”) granted the Company an exemptive order on November 25, 2013 (the “


	Prior
	Order


	”) pursuant to Sections 57(a)(4) and 57(i) and Rule 17d-1 permitting certain joint transactions that otherwise
	may be prohibited by Section 57(a)(4);


	 



	WHEREAS

	, management
	of the Company believes that it would be in the Company’s best interest to expand the scope of the Prior Order to allow the
	Company to enter into co-investment transactions with investment companies that are registered under the Investment Company Act
	of 1940, as amended (the “


	1940 Act


	”) and whose investment adviser is MCC Advisors, (ii) SIC Advisors,
	or (iii) any future investment adviser that Medley LLC controls, in addition to the existing and future business development companies
	and private funds currently covered by the Prior Order, and had such an expanded application prepared by counsel (the


	“New
	Exemptive Application”


	);


	 



	WHEREAS

	, the
	Board has reviewed the New Exemptive Application, a copy of which is attached hereto as Exhibit A, for an order of the SEC (the


	“New Order”


	) pursuant to Sections 17(d) and 57(i) of the 1940 Act, and Rule 17d-1 promulgated under the
	1940 Act, permitting certain joint transactions that otherwise may be prohibited by either or both of Sections 17(d) and 57(a)(4);


	 



	WHEREAS,

	the Board deems it advisable
	and in the best interest of the Company that the Company file the New Exemptive Application; and


	 



	WHEREAS

	, the
	Company will continue to rely on the Prior Order until the SEC issues the New Order, at which point the Company will cease relying
	on the Prior Order;


	 



	NOW, THEREFORE,
	BE IT RESOLVED

	, that the officers, shall be, and each of them individually hereby is, authorized, empowered and directed, in
	the name and on behalf of the Company, to cause to be executed, delivered and filed with the SEC the New Exemptive Application,
	in substantially the form attached hereto as Exhibit A;



	 




	FURTHER RESOLVED

	,
	that the officers shall be, and each of them individually hereby is, authorized, empowered and directed, in the name and on behalf
	of the Company, to cause to be made, executed, delivered and filed with the SEC any amendments to the New Exemptive Application
	and any additional applications for exemptive relief as are determined necessary, advisable or appropriate by any of the officers
	in order to effectuate the foregoing resolutions, such determination to be conclusively evidenced by the taking of any such action;



	 




	FURTHER RESOLVED

	,
	that all acts and things previously done by any of the officers, on or prior to the date hereof, in the name and on behalf of the
	Company in connection with the foregoing resolutions are in all respects authorized, ratified, approved, confirmed and adopted
	as the acts and deeds by and on behalf of the Company; and


	 



	FURTHER RESOLVED

	,
	that the officers be, and each of them hereby is, authorized, empowered and directed to certify and deliver copies of these resolutions
	to such governmental bodies, agencies, persons, firms or corporations as the officers may deem necessary and to identify by his
	or her signature or certificate, or in such form as may be required, the documents and instruments presented to and approved herein
	and to furnish evidence of the approval, by an officer authorized to give such approval, of any document, instrument or provision
	or any addition, deletion or change in any document or instrument.


	 


	(Adopted on July 21, 2016)

	 







	 









	28

	 







	 




	 




	EXHIBIT C


	 



	Resolution of the Sole Trustee
	of




	SIERRA TOTAL RETURN FUND




	 








	WHEREAS

	, the
	Board has reviewed the exemptive application (the


	“Exemptive Application”


	), a copy of which is attached
	hereto as Exhibit A, for an order of the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (the “


	SEC


	”) pursuant
	to Sections 17(d) and 57(i) of the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended (the “


	1940 Act


	”), and Rule
	17d-1 promulgated under the 1940 Act, permitting certain joint transactions that otherwise may be prohibited by either or both
	of Sections 17(d) and 57(a)(4); and


	 



	WHEREAS,

	the Board deems it advisable
	and in the best interest of the Company that the Company file the Exemptive Application;


	 



	NOW, THEREFORE,
	BE IT RESOLVED

	, that the officers, shall be, and each of them individually hereby is, authorized, empowered and directed, in
	the name and on behalf of the Company, to cause to be executed, delivered and filed with the SEC the Exemptive Application, in
	substantially the form attached hereto as Exhibit A;



	 




	FURTHER RESOLVED

	,
	that the officers shall be, and each of them individually hereby is, authorized, empowered and directed, in the name and on behalf
	of the Company, to cause to be made, executed, delivered and filed with the SEC any amendments to the Exemptive Application and
	any additional applications for exemptive relief as are determined necessary, advisable or appropriate by any of the officers in
	order to effectuate the foregoing resolutions, such determination to be conclusively evidenced by the taking of any such action;



	 




	FURTHER RESOLVED

	,
	that all acts and things previously done by any of the officers, on or prior to the date hereof, in the name and on behalf of the
	Company in connection with the foregoing resolutions are in all respects authorized, ratified, approved, confirmed and adopted
	as the acts and deeds by and on behalf of the Company; and


	 



	FURTHER RESOLVED

	,
	that the officers be, and each of them hereby is, authorized, empowered and directed to certify and deliver copies of these resolutions
	to such governmental bodies, agencies, persons, firms or corporations as the officers may deem necessary and to identify by his
	or her signature or certificate, or in such form as may be required, the documents and instruments presented to and approved herein
	and to furnish evidence of the approval, by an officer authorized to give such approval, of any document, instrument or provision
	or any addition, deletion or change in any document or instrument.


	 


	(Adopted on July 21, 2016)



	 







	 









	29

	 






	 


	 






























 



 Medley Capital Expands Its Credit Platform With the Acquisition of Credit Manager Viathon Capital 
         










    










 






 











 









Medley Capital Expands Its Credit Platform With the Acquisition of Credit Manager Viathon Capital

		  Leading Middle Market Credit Manager to Expand Analytical and Investment Teams
		

Apr 04, 2011, 02:05 ET
		  		  			
									 from   Medley Capital LLC 











 
















































 

 




















 


NEW YORK, April 4, 2011 /PRNewswire/ -- Medley Capital LLC ("Medley") announces the acquisition of credit hedge fund manager Viathon Capital LP and related entities ("Viathon"), effective March 31, 2011.
Medley, founded in 2005 by Managing Partners Brook Taube, Seth Taube and Andrew Fentress, provides capital and advisory services to middle market corporate and asset based borrowers in North America.  Medley is a registered investment adviser with $1.4 billion of assets under management in private investment funds, hedge funds and Medley Capital Corporation (NYSE:   MCC), a business development company.
Viathon, founded in 2006 by Robert Comizio, invests in fundamental and event driven opportunities across the credit spectrum.  Predominantly focused on companies in North America and Europe, Viathon identifies both long and short investments throughout an issuer's capital structure.  Prior to founding Viathon, Mr. Comizio was a Senior Portfolio Manager at Marathon Asset Management in the Special Opportunity Fund.  He began his career at Goldman Sachs after receiving an MBA from the University of Chicago and after graduating from the Wharton School at the University of Pennsylvania.  Mr. Comizio will become a Partner and the Senior Portfolio Manager for Medley Credit Strategies, LLC.  
"This transaction combines the analytical and credit strengths of the two organizations.  As a capital solutions provider to the middle market, the addition of Rob and his team will further enhance our debt and credit focused investment process and provides broader market perspectives and opportunities to both the borrower community and to our investors," said Brook Taube, Managing Partner at Medley. 
"Having known the Medley team for some time, I am excited about the opportunity to leverage our combined resources and to grow the firm's investment management and advisory franchise," added Robert Comizio.
About Medley Capital
Medley is a registered investment adviser with $1.4 billion of assets under management in private investment funds, hedge funds and Medley Capital Corporation (NYSE:   MCC), a business development company.  The firm specializes in credit investing, including direct private lending and corporate credit related strategies.  Medley, with 35 employees, is headquartered in New York with offices in San Francisco.  Medley investors include public and private pension funds, endowment funds, insurance companies, institutional investors and alternative investment managers.  For more information about the firm, please visit www.medleycapital.com. 
 SOURCE  Medley Capital LLC  

RELATED LINKS
http://www.medleycapital.com



  

 View Table Fullscreen 




  View Table Fullscreen 





Journalists and Bloggers
The news you need, when you need it.
 
Join PR Newswire for Journalists to access all of the free services designated to make your job easier.
In need of subject matter experts for your story? Submit a free ProfNet request and find the sources you need.
LEARN MORE




 

 
 



















































  





My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.





Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

 















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 


 

      Federal Register
       :: 
      Medley Capital Corporation, et al.; Notice of Application
    




















































  Skip to Content








 



    Sections
    
 




            Money
 



            Environment
 



            World
 



            Science & Technology
 



            Business & Industry
 



            Health & Public Welfare
 













Health Insurance Premium Tax Credit


                by the Internal Revenue Service
                on
                07/26/2017




                photo by:
                frankieleon






 
 








Dodd-Frank Wall Steet Reform


                          255
                          documents in the last year
                        



Government Contracts


                          50
                          documents in the last year
                        





Stock & Commodities Trading 


                          491
                          documents in the last year
                        



Economic Sanctions & Foreign Assets Control


                          657
                          documents in the last year
                        


 




                      29
                    

                      New Documents
                      In this Issue
                    
 



                      1
                    

                      Document
                      Open for Comment
                    
 
 
 
 












Migratory Bird Hunting


                by the Fish and Wildlife Service
                on
                07/26/2017




                photo by:
                Kevin Squeak






 
 








Endangered & Threatened Species


                          914
                          documents in the last year
                        



Fishery Management


                          1512
                          documents in the last year
                        





Taking of Marine Mammals


                          310
                          documents in the last year
                        



Parks & Recreation


                          933
                          documents in the last year
                        


 




                      24
                    

                      New Documents
                      In this Issue
                    
 



                      12
                    

                      Documents
                      Open for Comment
                    
 
 
 
 












Arms Sales Notification


                by the Defense Department
                on
                07/26/2017




                photo by:
                U.S. Pacific Fleet






 
 








Immigration & Border Control


                          252
                          documents in the last year
                        



Cultural Objects Imported for Exhibition


                          99
                          documents in the last year
                        





International Trade (Anti-Dumping)


                          829
                          documents in the last year
                        



Controlled Exports (CCL & USML)


                          62
                          documents in the last year
                        


 




                      12
                    

                      New Documents
                      In this Issue
                    
 



                      2
                    

                      Documents
                      Open for Comment
                    
 
 
 
 












Aeronautical Information and Meteorological Data Link Services Plenary


                by the Federal Aviation Administration
                on
                07/26/2017




                photo by:
                NASA Goddard Space Flight Center






 
 








Broadband Policy


                          165
                          documents in the last year
                        



Patent, Trademark, and Copyright


                          1346
                          documents in the last year
                        





Energy Efficiency & Renewable Resources


                          348
                          documents in the last year
                        



Climate Change


                          351
                          documents in the last year
                        


 




                      35
                    

                      New Documents
                      In this Issue
                    
 



                      11
                    

                      Documents
                      Open for Comment
                    
 
 
 
 












Branded Prescription Drug Fee


                by the Internal Revenue Service
                on
                07/26/2017




                photo by:
                A.






 
 








Automobile Safety & Fuel Economy


                          49
                          documents in the last year
                        



Oil and Gas Leasing


                          32
                          documents in the last year
                        





Air Travel


                          92
                          documents in the last year
                        



Trade Adjustment Assistance


                          99
                          documents in the last year
                        


 




                      60
                    

                      New Documents
                      In this Issue
                    
 



                      12
                    

                      Documents
                      Open for Comment
                    
 
 
 
 












Workforce Information Advisory Council


                by the Employment and Training Administration
                on
                07/26/2017




                photo by:
                DonkeyHotey






 
 








Health Care Reform


                          195
                          documents in the last year
                        



Veterans Educational Benefits


                          1
                          documents in the last year
                        





Veterans Employment & Training


                          48
                          documents in the last year
                        



Disaster Declarations & Assistance


                          883
                          documents in the last year
                        


 




                      36
                    

                      New Documents
                      In this Issue
                    
 



                      6
                    

                      Documents
                      Open for Comment
                    
 
 
 
 







    Browse
    
 




          Agencies
 



          Topics (CFR Indexing Terms)
 



          Dates
 



          Public Inspection
 



          Executive Orders
 




  Explore Agencies



















Agriculture Department

22


18



Commerce Department

54


12



Defense Department

19


3



Education Department

11


2



Energy Department

46


4



Environmental Protection Agency

35


33



Health and Human Services Department

67


22



Homeland Security Department

47


10



Housing and Urban Development Department

1


          0
        


Interior Department

25


12



Justice Department

21


2



Labor Department

10


8



State Department

7


4



Transportation Department

69


41



Treasury Department

14


8



Veterans Affairs Department

9


10








  Explore Topics (CFR Indexing Terms)



















Administrative practice and procedure

11


6



Air pollution control

10


14



Air transportation

16


9



Airspace

12


2



Aviation safety

16


15



Environmental protection

12


15



Intergovernmental relations

8


11



Navigation (air)

13


2



Ozone

7


7



Volatile organic compounds

7


7












            Current Issue

              
                238 Pages
              




124 documents
    from 48 agencies

  



113 Notices


1 Presidential Document


6 Proposed Rules


3 Rules









Go to a specific date

Go to a specific date:


 





Explore


« PrevJuneNext »SMTWTFS282930311234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829301


« PrevJulySMTWTFS2526272829301234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829303112345












          The Public Inspection page
          on FederalRegister.gov
          offers a preview of documents scheduled to appear in the next day's
          Federal Register issue. The Public Inspection page may also
          include documents scheduled for later issues, at the request
          of the issuing agency.
        










Special Filing

          updated on 11:15 AM, on Wednesday, July 26, 2017
        


5 documents
            from 3 agencies
          


2 Notices


1 Proposed Rule


2 Rules









Regular Filing

          updated on 08:45 AM, on Wednesday, July 26, 2017
        


125 documents
            from 41 agencies
          


94 Notices


10 Proposed Rules


21 Rules














Go to a specific date

Go to a specific date:


 





Explore


« PrevJuneNext »SMTWTFS282930311234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829301


« PrevJulySMTWTFS2526272829301234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829303112345












Donald Trump


EO 13806:
Assessing and Strengthening the Manufacturing and Defense Industrial Base and Supply Chain Resiliency of the United States


EO 13805:
Establishing a Presidential Advisory Council on Infrastructure


EO 13804:
Allowing Additional Time for Recognizing Positive Actions by the Government of Sudan and Amending Executive Order 13761




                  2017:
                  42







Barack Obama


                  2017:
                  7


                  2016:
                  41


                  2015:
                  29


                  2014:
                  31


                  2013:
                  21


                  2012:
                  38


                  2011:
                  34


                  2010:
                  37


                  2009:
                  37







George W. Bush


                  2009:
                  3


                  2008:
                  30


                  2007:
                  33


                  2006:
                  26


                  2005:
                  27


                  2004:
                  46


                  2003:
                  40


                  2002:
                  33


                  2001:
                  51







William J. Clinton


                  2001:
                  7


                  2000:
                  39


                  1999:
                  35


                  1998:
                  38


                  1997:
                  38


                  1996:
                  50


                  1995:
                  40


                  1994:
                  54












    Search
    





        Document Search
 



        Advanced Document Search
 



        Public Inspection Search
 



        FR Index
 





    Reader Aids
    



Reader Aids Home


Office of the Federal Register Blog


Using FederalRegister.Gov


Understanding the Federal Register


Recent Site Updates


Videos & Tutorials


Developer Resources


Government Policy and OFR Procedures






    My FR
    




My Account


My Clipboard


My Comments


My Subscriptions


Sign In / Sign Up





Search the Federal Register


 





0



Sign in
Sign up

 









The Federal Register
The Daily Journal of the United States Government










Legal Status
Legal Status 
 
  Notice



Medley Capital Corporation, et al.; Notice of Application


      A Notice by the Securities and Exchange Commission on 03/09/2017











 













Document DetailsInformation about this document as published in the Federal Register.

Printed version:

PDF

Publication Date:

03/09/2017

Agency:

Securities and Exchange Commission

Dates:
The application was filed on July 26, 2016, and amended on December 23, 2016. Applicants have agreed to file an amendment during the notice period, the substance of which is reflected in this notice.
Document Type:
Notice
Document Citation:

          82 FR 13150
        
Page:

          13150-13155
          (6 pages)
        
Agency/Docket Numbers:
Release No. IC-32520
File No. 812-14679
Document Number:
2017-04591

Document Details



















Enhanced Content - Table of Contents

            This tables of contents is a navigational tool, processed from the
            headings within the legal text of Federal Register documents.
            This repetition of headings to form internal navigation links
            has no substantive legal effect.
          

AGENCY:
ACTION:
Summary of Application:
Applicants:
Filing Dates:
Hearing or Notification of Hearing:
ADDRESSES:
FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:
SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:
Applicants' Representations
Applicants' Legal Analysis
Applicants' Conditions
Footnotes

Enhanced Content - Table of Contents 



Enhanced Content - Submit Public Comment


              This feature is not available for this document.
          

Enhanced Content - Submit Public Comment 



Enhanced Content - Read Public Comments


              This feature is not available for this document.
          

Enhanced Content - Read Public Comments 


Enhanced Content - Sharing

Shorter Document URL

https://www.federalregister.gov/d/2017-04591
https://www.federalregister.gov/d/2017-04591






              Email this document to a friend
            



Share this document on Twitter



Share this document on Facebook


Enhanced Content - Sharing 



Enhanced Content - Document Print View

Print this document

Enhanced Content - Document Print View 


Enhanced Content - Document Tools

            These tools are designed to help you understand the official document
            better and aid in comparing the online edition to the print edition.
          



                These markup elements allow the user to see how the document follows the
                
                  Document Drafting Handbook
                 that agencies use to create their documents. These can be useful
                for better understanding how a document is structured but
                are not part of the published document itself.
              
Display Non-Printed Markup Elements


Enhanced Content - Document Tools 


Enhanced Content - Developer Tools

          This document is available in the following developer friendly formats:
        


JSON: Normalized attributes and metadata


XML: Original full text XML


MODS: Government Publishing Office metadata



          More information and documentation can be found in our
          developer tools pages.
        
Enhanced Content - Developer Tools 


Official Content


View printed version (PDF)


Official Content 


Public Inspection



              This PDF is
              the current document as it appeared on Public Inspection on
              03/08/2017 at 08:45 am.
            

              If you are using public inspection listings for legal research, you
    should verify the contents of the documents against a final, official
    edition of the Federal Register. Only official editions of the
    Federal Register provide legal notice to the public and judicial notice
    to the courts under 44 U.S.C. 1503 & 1507.
    Learn more here.
            

Public Inspection 


Published DocumentThis document has been published in the Federal Register. Use the PDF linked in the document sidebar for the official electronic format.





Start Preamble
        
        
        
        March 3, 2017.
        
          AGENCY:
Securities and Exchange Commission (“Commission”).
ACTION:
Notice of application for an order under sections 17(d) and 57(i) of the Investment Company Act of 1940 (the “Act”) and Rule 17d-1 under the Act to permit certain joint transactions otherwise prohibited by sections 17(d) and 57(a)(4) of the Act and Rule 17d-1 under the Act.
Summary of Application:
Applicants request an order to permit certain business development companies (each, a “BDC”) and closed-end management investment companies to co-invest with each other and with certain affiliated investment funds in portfolio companies.
Applicants:
Medley Capital Corporation (“MCC”); Medley SBIC, LP (“Medley SBIC”); Medley SBIC GP, LLC (the “SBIC General Partner”); Medley LLC; MCC Advisors LLC (“MCC Advisors”); Medley Capital LLC, MOF II Management LLC, and MOF III Management LLC (collectively, the “Existing Affiliated Investment Advisers”); MOF II GP LLC, MOF III GP LLC, and Medley Credit Strategies GP, LLC (collectively, the “Existing General Partners”); Medley Opportunity Fund III LP, Medley Opportunity Fund II LP, and Medley Credit Strategies (KOC) LLC (collectively, the “Existing Affiliated Funds”); Sierra Income Corporation (“Sierra”); SIC Advisors LLC (“SIC Advisors”); Sierra Total Return Fund (“STRF”); STRF Advisors LLC (“STRF Advisors”); Sierra Opportunity Fund (“SOF”); and SOF Advisor LLC (“SOF Advisors”).
Filing Dates:
The application was filed on July 26, 2016, and amended on December 23, 2016. Applicants have agreed to file an amendment during the notice period, the substance of which is reflected in this notice.
Hearing or Notification of Hearing:
An order granting the requested relief will be issued unless the Commission orders a hearing. Interested persons may request a hearing by writing to the Commission's Secretary and serving applicants with a copy of the request, personally or by mail. Hearing requests should be received by the Commission by 5:30 p.m. on March 28, 2017 and should be accompanied by proof of service on applicants, in the form of an affidavit or, for lawyers, a certificate of service. Hearing requests should state the nature of the writer's interest, the reason for the request, and the issues contested. Persons who wish to be notified of a hearing may request notification by writing to the Commission's Secretary.
ADDRESSES:
Secretary, U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, 100 F St. NE., Washington, DC 20549-1090. Applicants: c/o Brooke Taube, Medley Capital Corporation, Seth Taube, Sierra Income Corporation, Sierra Total Return Fund, and Sierra Opportunity Fund, 280 Park Avenue, 6th Floor East, New York, NY 10017.
Start Further Info
FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:
Hae-Sung Lee, Attorney-Adviser, at (202) 551-7345, or David J. Marcinkus, Branch Chief, at (202) 551-6821 (Chief Counsel's Office, Division of Investment Management).
End Further Info
End Preamble
Start Supplemental Information
SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION:
The following is a summary of the application. The complete application may be obtained via the Commission's Web site by searching for the file number, or for an applicant using the Company name box, at http://www.sec.gov/​search/​search.htm or by calling (202) 551-8090.
Applicants' Representations
1. MCC is an externally managed, non-diversified, closed-end management investment company that has elected to be regulated as a BDC Start Printed Page 13151under the Act.[1] 
           MCC's investment objective is to generate current income and capital appreciation by lending directly to privately-held middle market companies. MCC's board of directors (the “MCC Board”) currently consists of seven members, four of whom are not “interested persons” as defined in section 2(a)(19) of the Act (the “Independent Directors”). Each of Brooke Taube and Seth Taube (the “Principals”) and Jeff Tonkel serves as an interested director on the MCC Board.
2. Applicants represent that Medley SBIC was organized as a limited partnership under the laws of the state of Delaware and is licensed by the Small Business Administration (“SBA”) to operate under the Small Business Investment Act of 1958, as amended (“SBA Act”), as a small business investment company (each such licensed entity, an “SBIC Subsidiary”). Applicants state that Medley SBIC will not be registered under the Act based on the exclusion from the definition of investment company contained in section 3(c)(7). The SBIC General Partner was organized as a limited liability company under the laws of the state of Delaware and is the general partner of Medley SBIC. Applicants represent that Medley SBIC is functionally a wholly-owned subsidiary of MCC because MCC and the SBIC General Partner (which is a wholly-owned subsidiary of MCC) own all of the equity and voting interests in Medley SBIC.
3. Sierra is an externally managed, non-diversified, closed-end management investment company that has elected to be regulated as a BDC under the Act. Sierra's investment objective is to generate current income and capital appreciation by investing primarily in the debt of privately-held U.S. companies with a focus on senior secured debt, second lien debt and, to a lesser extent, subordinated debt. Sierra's board of directors (the “Sierra Board”) currently consists of five members, three of whom are Independent Directors. Each of the Principals serves as an interested director on the Sierra Board.
4. STRF is an externally managed, non-diversified, closed-end management investment company registered under the Act. STRF will be operated as an interval fund. STRF's investment objective is to generate total return through a combination of current income and long-term capital appreciation by investing in a portfolio of debt securities and equities. STRF's board of directors (the “STRF Board”) currently consists of five members, three of whom are Independent Directors. Each of the Principals serves as an interested trustee on the STRF Board.
5. SOF is an externally managed, non-divsersified, closed-end management investment company registered under the Act. SOF will be operated as an interval fund. SOF's investment objective is to generate current income and, as a secondary objective, long-term capital appreciation. SOF's board of directors (the “SOF Board”) currently consists of five members, three of whom are Independent Directors. Each of the Principals serves as an interested trustee on the SOF Board.
6. MCC Advisors is registered as an investment adviser under the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 (the “Advisers Act”) and serves as the investment adviser to MCC. SIC Advisors is registered as an investment adviser under the Advisers Act and serves as the investment adviser to Sierra. STRF Advisors is registered as an investment adviser under the Advisers Act and serves as an investment adviser to STRF. SOF Advisors is registered as an investment adviser under the Advisers Act and serves as an investment adviser to SOF. The Existing Affiliated Investment Advisers are registered under the Advisers Act and currently serve as investment advisers to the Existing Affiliated Funds. Medley LLC, which is controlled by the Principals, controls each of the Existing Affiliated Investment Advisers.[2] 
           The Existing General Partners are the general partners of certain of the Existing Affiliated Funds. The Existing General Partners are direct, wholly-owned subsidiaries of Medley GP Holdings LLC, which is controlled by the Principals.
7. Each of the Existing Affiliated Funds is a separate legal entity and is excluded from the definition of “investment company” under section 3(c)(1) or 3(c)(7) of the Act.
8. Applicants seek to supersede the Prior Order [3] 
           to permit a Regulated Entity and one or more other Regulated Entities and/or one or more Affiliated Funds to participate in the same investment opportunities through a proposed co-investment program where such participation would otherwise be prohibited under sections 17(d) and 57(a)(4) and rule 17d-1 (the “Co-Investment Program”).[4] 
           For purposes of the application, a “Co-Investment Transaction” means any transaction in which a Regulated Entity (or its Wholly-Owned Investment Sub, as defined below) participated, in reliance on the Order or the Prior Order), (a) together with one or more other Regulated Entities and/or (b) together with one or more Affiliated Funds. A “Potential Co-Investment Transaction” means any investment opportunity in which a Regulated Entity (or its Wholly-Owned Investment Sub) could not participate together with one or more Regulated Entities and/or together with one or more Affiliated Funds without obtaining and relying on the Order. Affiliated Funds that have the capacity to, and elect to, co-invest with the Regulated Entities are referred to as “Participating Funds.”
9. Applicants state that a Regulated Entity may, from time to time, form one or more Wholly-Owned Investment Subs.[5] 
           Such a subsidiary would be Start Printed Page 13152prohibited from investing in a Co-Investment Transaction with any Affiliated Fund or another Regulated Entity because it would be a company controlled by the Regulated Entity for purposes of sections 17(d) and 57(a)(4) and rule 17d-1. Applicants request that each Wholly-Owned Investment Sub be permitted to participate in Co-Investment Transactions in lieu of the Regulated Entity that owns it and that the Wholly-Owned Investment Sub's participation in any such transaction be treated, for purposes of the Order, as though the Regulated Entity were participating directly. Applicants represent that this treatment is justified because a Wholly-Owned Investment Sub would have no purpose other than serving as a holding vehicle for the Regulated Entity's investments and, therefore, no conflicts of interest could arise between the Regulated Entity and the Wholly-Owned Investment Sub. The Regulated Entity's Board would make all relevant determinations under the conditions with regard to a Wholly-Owned Investment Sub's participation in a Co-Investment Transaction, and the Regulated Entity's Board would be informed of, and take into consideration, any proposed use of a Wholly-Owned Investment Sub in the Regulated Entity's place. If the Regulated Entity proposes to participate in the same Co-Investment Transaction with any of its Wholly-Owned Investment Subs, the Board of the Regulated Entity will also be informed of, and take into consideration, the relative participation of the Regulated Entity and the Wholly-Owned Investment Sub.
10. In selecting investments for each Regulated Entity, the Regulated Entity Advisers will consider the investment objective, investment policies, investment position, capital available for investment, and other factors relevant to the respective Regulated Entities they advise. The Regulated Entity Advisers expect that any portfolio company that is an appropriate investment for a Regulated Entity should also be an appropriate investment for one or more other Regulated Entities and/or one or more Affiliated Funds, with certain exceptions based on available capital or diversification.[6] 
           The Regulated Entity Adviser, as applicable, will present each Potential Co-Investment Transaction and the proposed allocation of each investment opportunity to the directors of the relevant Regulated Entity's Board that are eligible to vote under section 57(o) of the Act (the “Eligible Directors”). The “required majority,” as defined in section 57(o) (“Required Majority”) of a Regulated Entity will approve each Co-Investment Transaction prior to any investment by the Regulated Entity.
11. All subsequent activity (i.e., exits or Follow-On Investments, as defined below) in a Co-Investment Transaction will also be made in accordance with the terms and conditions set forth in the application.[7] 
           A Regulated Entity may participate in a pro rata disposition or Follow-On Investment without obtaining prior approval of the Required Majority if, among other things: (i) The proposed participation of each Regulated Entity and Affiliated Fund is proportionate to its outstanding investments in the issuer immediately preceding the disposition or Follow-On Investment, as the case may be; and (ii) the Board of the Regulated Entity has approved that Regulated Entity's participation in pro rata dispositions and Follow-On Investments as being in the best interests of the Regulated Entity. If the Board has not given such approval in advance, any such disposition or Follow-On Investment will be submitted to the Regulated Entity's Eligible Directors. The Board of a Regulated Entity may at any time rescind, suspend or qualify its approval of pro rata dispositions and Follow-On Investments with the result that all dispositions and/or Follow-On Investments must be submitted to the Eligible Directors.
12. Applicants state that none of the Principals will benefit directly or indirectly from any Co-Investment Transaction (other than by virtue of the ownership of securities of MCC and the Affiliated Investment Advisers) or participate individually in any Co-Investment Transaction. In addition, no Independent Director will have any direct or indirect financial interest in any Co-Investment Transaction or any interest in any portfolio company, other than through an interest (if any) in the securities of a Regulated Entity.
Applicants' Legal Analysis
1. Section 17(d) of the Act and rule 17d-1 under the Act are applicable to Regulated Entities that are registered closed-end investment companies. Section 17(d) of the Act and rule 17d-1 under the Act prohibit participation by a registered investment company and an affiliated person in any “joint enterprise or other joint arrangement or profit-sharing plan,” as defined in the rule, without prior approval by the Commission by order upon application.
2. Similarly, with regard to BDCs, Section 57(a)(4) of the Act prohibits certain affiliated persons of a BDC from participating in joint transactions with the BDC or a company controlled by such BDC in contravention of rules as prescribed by the Commission. Under section 57(b)(2) of the Act, any person who is directly or indirectly controlling, controlled by, or under common control with a BDC is subject to section 57(a)(4). Applicants submit that each of the Affiliated Funds and the other Regulated Entities could be deemed to be a person related to each Regulated Entity in a manner described by section 57(b) by virtue of being under common control with such Regulated Entity.
2. Section 57(i) of the Act provides that, until the Commission prescribes rules under section 57(a)(4), the Commission's rules under section 17(d) of the Act applicable to registered closed-end investment companies will be deemed to apply to BDCs. Because the Commission has not adopted any rules under section 57(a)(4), rule 17d-1 applies.
3. Rule 17d-1, as made applicable to BDCs by section 57(i), prohibits any person who is related to a BDC in a manner described in section 57(b), acting as principal, from participating in, or effecting any transaction in connection with, any joint enterprise or other joint arrangement or profit-sharing plan in which the BDC or a company controlled by such BDC is a participant, absent an order from the Commission. In passing upon applications under rule 17d-1, the Commission considers whether the participation by the BDC or controlled company in the joint transaction is consistent with the provisions, policies, and purposes of the Act and the extent to which such participation is on a basis different from or less advantageous than that of other participants.
4. Applicants state that they expect that co-investment in portfolio companies by the Regulated Entities and the Affiliated Funds will increase the number of favorable investment opportunities for the Regulated Entities Start Printed Page 13153and that the Co-Investment Program will be implemented only if the Required Majority of the applicable Regulated Entity approves it.
5. Applicants submit that the Required Majority's approval of each Co-Investment Transaction before investment, and other protective conditions set forth in the application, will ensure that the applicable Regulated Entity will be treated fairly. Applicants state that the Regulated Entities' participation in the Co-Investment Transactions will be consistent with the provisions, policies, and purposes of the Act and on a basis that is not different from or less advantageous than that of other participants.
6. Under condition 14, if the Regulated Entity Advisers or the Principals, or any person controlling, controlled by, or under common control with the Regulated Entity Advisers or the Principals, and the Affiliated Funds (collectively, the “Holders”) own in the aggregate more than 25% of the outstanding voting securities of a Regulated Entity (“Shares”), then the Holders will vote such Shares as directed by an independent third party when voting on matters specified in the condition. Applicants believe that this condition will ensure that the Independent Directors will act independently in evaluating the Co-Investment Program, because the ability of the Regulated Entity Advisers or the Principals to influence the Independent Directors by a suggestion, explicit or implied, that the Independent Directors can be removed will be limited significantly. Applicants represent that the Independent Directors will evaluate and approve any independent third party, taking into accounts its qualifications, reputation for independence, cost to the shareholders, and other factors that they deem relevant.
Applicants' Conditions
Applicants agree that any order granting the requested relief will be subject to the following conditions:
1. Each time a Regulated Entity Adviser or an Affiliated Investment Adviser considers a Potential Co-Investment Transaction for an Affiliated Fund or another Regulated Entity that falls within the then-current Objectives and Strategies of a Regulated Entity,[8] 
           the appropriate Regulated Entity Adviser will make an independent determination of the appropriateness of the investment for the Regulated Entity in light of the Regulated Entity's then-current circumstances.
2. (a) If a Regulated Entity Adviser deems a Regulated Entity's participation in any Potential Co-Investment Transaction to be appropriate for such Regulated Entity, it will then determine an appropriate level of investment for such Regulated Entity.
(b) If the aggregate amount recommended by Regulated Entity Advisers to be invested by the Regulated Entities in such Potential Co-Investment Transaction, together with the amount proposed to be invested by each Participating Fund, collectively, in the same transaction, exceeds the amount of the investment opportunity, the amount proposed to be invested by each such party will be allocated among them pro rata based on each participating party's capital available for investment in the asset class being allocated, up to the amount proposed to be invested by each. The Regulated Entity Advisers will provide the respective Eligible Directors with information concerning each party's available capital to assist the Eligible Directors with their review of such Regulated Entity's investments for compliance with these allocation procedures.
(c) After making the determinations required in conditions 1 and 2(a), the Regulated Entity Advisers will distribute written information concerning the Potential Co-Investment Transaction, including the amount proposed to be invested by each Regulated Entity and any Participating Fund, to the Eligible Directors of the each participating Regulated Entity for their consideration. A Regulated Entity will co-invest with another Regulated Entity and/or any Participating Fund only if, prior to participating in the Potential Co-Investment Transaction, a Required Majority of the Regulated Entity concludes that:
(i) The terms of the transaction, including the consideration to be paid, are reasonable and fair to the Regulated Entity and its stockholders and do not involve overreaching in respect of the Regulated Entity or its stockholders on the part of any person concerned;
(ii) the transaction is consistent with
(A) the interests of the Regulated Entity's stockholders; and
(B) the Regulated Entity's then-current Objectives and Strategies.
(iii) the investment by another Regulated Entity or one or more Participating Funds would not disadvantage the Regulated Entity, and participation by such Regulated Entity is not on a basis different from or less advantageous than that of any Participating Fund or other Regulated Entity; provided that, if any Participating Fund or other Regulated Entity, but not the Regulated Entity itself, gains the right to nominate a director for election to a portfolio company's board of directors or the right to have a board observer or any similar right to participate in the governance or management of the portfolio company, such event shall not be interpreted to prohibit the Required Majority from reaching the conclusions required by this condition (2)(c)(iii), if
(A) the Eligible Directors shall have the right to ratify the selection of such director or board observer, if any;
(B) the Regulated Entity Adviser agrees to, and does, provide periodic reports to the Board of the applicable Regulated Entity with respect to the actions of such director or the information received by such board observer or obtained through the exercise of any similar right to participate in the governance or management of the portfolio company; and
(C) any fees or other compensation that any other Regulated Entity or any Participating Fund or any affiliated person of either receives in connection with the right of a Participating Fund or other Regulated Entity to nominate a director or appoint a board observer or otherwise to participate in the governance or management of the portfolio company will be shared proportionately among any Participating Funds (who may, in turn, share their portion with their affiliated persons) and the participating Regulated Entities in accordance with the amount of each party's investment; and
(iv) the proposed investment by the Regulated Entity will not benefit the Regulated Entity Advisers, the Affiliated Funds or other Regulated Entities, or any affiliated person of any of them (other than the other parties to the Co-Investment Transaction), except (a) to the extent permitted by condition 13; (b) to the extent permitted by sections 17(e) or 57(k), as applicable; (c) indirectly, as a result of an interest in securities issued by one of the parties to the Co-Investment Transaction; or (d) in the case of fees or other compensation described in condition 2(c)(iii)(C).
3. Each Regulated Entity has the right to decline to participate in any Potential Start Printed Page 13154Co-Investment Transaction or to invest less than the amount proposed.
4. The Regulated Entity Advisers will present to the Board of each Regulated Entity, as applicable, on a quarterly basis, a record of all investments in Potential Co-Investment Transactions made by the Affiliated Funds and other Regulated Entities during the preceding quarter that fell within the Regulated Entity's then-current Objectives and Strategies that were not made available to the respective Regulated Entity, and an explanation of why the investment opportunities were not offered to the Regulated Entity. All information presented to the Board pursuant to this condition will be kept for the life of the Regulated Entity and at least two years thereafter, and will be subject to examination by the Commission and its staff.
5. Except for Follow-On Investments made pursuant to condition 8 below,[9] 
           a Regulated Entity will not invest in reliance on the Order in any portfolio company in which any other Regulated Entity, any Affiliated Fund, or any affiliated person of any other Regulated Entity or Affiliated Fund is an existing investor.
6. A Regulated Entity will not participate in any Potential Co-Investment Transaction unless the terms, conditions, price, class of securities to be purchased, settlement date and registration rights will be the same for such Regulated Entity as for the Participating Funds and/or other Regulated Entities. The grant to an Affiliated Fund or another Regulated Entity, but not such Regulated Entity, of the right to nominate a director for election to a portfolio company's board of directors, the right to have an observer on the board of directors or similar rights to participate in the governance or management of the portfolio company will not be interpreted so as to violate this condition 6, if conditions 2(c)(iii)(A), (B) and (C) are met.
7. (a) If any Regulated Entity or Participating Fund elects to sell, exchange, or otherwise dispose of an interest in a security that was acquired in a Co-Investment Transaction, then:
(i) The investment adviser to such Regulated Entity or Participating Fund will notify each other Regulated Entity that participated in the Co-Investment Transaction of the proposed disposition at the earliest practical time; and
(ii) the investment adviser to each other Regulated Entity that participated in the Co-Investment Transaction will formulate a recommendation as to participation by such Regulated Entity in the disposition.
(b) Each Regulated Entity will have the right to participate in such disposition on a proportionate basis, at the same price and on the same terms and conditions as those applicable to any Participating Funds and any other Regulated Entities.
(c) A Regulated Entity may participate in such disposition without obtaining prior approval of the Required Majority if: (i) The proposed participation of each Regulated Entity and the Participating Funds in such disposition is proportionate to its outstanding investments in the issuer immediately preceding the disposition; (ii) the Board of the applicable Regulated Entity has approved as being in the best interests of the applicable Regulated Entity the ability to participate in such dispositions on a pro rata basis (as described in greater detail in the application); and (iii) the Board of the applicable Regulated Entity is provided on a quarterly basis with a list of all dispositions made in accordance with this condition. In all other cases, the applicable Regulated Entity Adviser will provide its written recommendation as to such Regulated Entity's participation to the Eligible Directors, and such Regulated Entity will participate in such disposition solely to the extent that a Required Majority determines that it is in such Regulated Entity's best interests.
(d) Each Regulated Entity and each of the Participating Funds will bear its own expenses in connection with any such disposition.
8. (a) If any Regulated Entity or Participating Fund desires to make a Follow-On Investment in a portfolio company whose securities were acquired in a Co-Investment Transaction, then:
(i) The investment adviser to such Regulated Entity or Participating Fund will notify each other Regulated Entity that participated in the Co-Investment Transaction of the proposed transaction at the earliest practical time; and
(ii) the investment adviser to each other Regulated Entity that participated in the Co-Investment Transaction will formulate a recommendation as to the proposed participation, including the amount of the proposed investment, by such Regulated Entity.
(b) A Regulated Entity may participate in such Follow-On Investment without obtaining prior approval of the Required Majority if: (i) The proposed participation of each Regulated Entity and Participating Fund in such investment is proportionate to its outstanding investments in the issuer immediately preceding the Follow-On Investment; (ii) the Board of the applicable Regulated Entity has approved as being in the best interests of such Regulated Entity the ability to participate in Follow-On Investments on a pro rata basis (as described in greater detail in the application); and (iii) the Board of the applicable Regulated Entity is provided on a quarterly basis with a list of all Follow-On Investments made in accordance with this condition. In all other cases, the applicable Regulated Entity Adviser will provide its written recommendation as to such Regulated Entity's participation to the Eligible Directors, and such Regulated Entity will participate in such follow-on investment solely to the extent that a Required Majority determines that it is in such Regulated Entity's best interests.
(c) If, with respect to any follow-on investment:
(i) The amount of the opportunity is not based on the Regulated Entities' and the Participating Funds' outstanding investments immediately preceding the follow-on investment; and
(ii) the aggregate amount recommended by the applicable Regulated Entity Adviser to be invested by each Regulated Entity in such Co-Investment Transaction, together with the amount proposed to be invested by the Participating Funds and/or other Regulated Entity, collectively, in the same transaction, exceeds the amount of the investment opportunity, then the amount to be invested by each such party will be allocated among them pro rata based on each party's capital available for investment in the asset class being allocated, up to the amount proposed to be invested by each.
(d) The acquisition of Follow-On Investments as permitted by this condition will be considered a Co-Investment Transaction for all purposes and be subject to the other conditions set forth in the application.
9. The Independent Directors of each Regulated Entity will be provided quarterly for review all information concerning Potential Co-Investment Transactions and Co-Investment Transactions, including investments made by other Regulated Entities or Affiliated Funds that the Regulated Entity considered but declined to participate in, so that the Independent Directors may determine whether all investments made during the preceding quarter, including those investments that the Regulated Entity considered but declined to participate in, comply with the conditions of the Order. In addition, the Independent Directors will consider at least annually the continued Start Printed Page 13155appropriateness for the Regulated Entities of participating in new and existing Co-Investment Transactions.
10. Each Regulated Entity will maintain the records required by section 57(f)(3) as if each of the Regulated Entities were a BDC and each of the investments permitted under these conditions were approved by the Required Majority under section 57(f).
11. No Independent Director of a Regulated Entity will also be a director, general partner, managing member or principal, or otherwise an “affiliated person” (as defined in the Act) of, any of the Affiliated Funds.
12. The expenses, if any, associated with acquiring, holding or disposing of any securities acquired in a Co-Investment Transaction (including, without limitation, the expenses of the distribution of any such securities registered for sale under the 1933 Act) shall, to the extent not payable by the Regulated Entity Advisers or the Affiliated Investment Advisers under their respective investment advisory agreements with the Regulated Entities and the Participating Funds, be shared by the applicable Regulated Entities and the Participating Funds in proportion to the relative amounts of their securities held or being acquired or disposed of, as the case may be.
13. Any transaction fee (including break-up or commitment fees but excluding brokers' fees contemplated by section 57(k)(2) or 17(e)(2), as applicable) received in connection with a Co-Investment Transaction will be distributed to the applicable Regulated Entities and the Participating Funds on a pro rata basis based on the amounts each invested or committed, as the case may be, in such Co-Investment Transaction. If any transaction fee is to be held by a Regulated Entity Adviser or an Affiliated Investment Adviser pending consummation of the transaction, the fee will be deposited into an account maintained by the Regulated Entity Adviser or such other adviser, as the case may be, at a bank or banks having the qualifications prescribed in Section 26(a)(1), and the account will earn a competitive rate of interest that will also be divided pro rata among each applicable Regulated Entity and each Participating Fund based on the amount each invests in such Co-Investment Transaction. None of the Affiliated Funds, Regulated Entity Advisers, Affiliated Investment Advisers, or any affiliated person of any of the Regulated Entities will receive additional compensation or remuneration of any kind (other than (a) in the case of the Regulated Entities and the Participating Funds, the pro rata transaction fees described above and fees or other compensation described in condition 2(c)(iii)(C) and (b) in the case of the Regulated Entity Advisers and the Affiliated Advisers, investment advisory fees paid in accordance with the Regulated Entities' and Affiliated Funds' governing agreements) as a result of or in connection with a Co-Investment Transaction.
14. If the Regulated Entity Advisers, the Principals, any person controlling, controlled by, or under common control with the Regulated Entity Advisers or the Principals, and the Affiliated Funds (collectively, the “Holders”) own in the aggregate more than 25% of the outstanding voting securities of a Regulated Entity (“Shares”), then the Holders will vote such Shares as directed by an independent third party when voting on (1) the election of directors; (2) the removal of one or more directors; or (3) any other matter under either the Act or applicable State law affecting the Board's composition, size or manner of election.
15. The Regulated Entity Advisers and the Affiliated Investment Advisers will maintain written policies and procedures reasonably designed to ensure compliance with the foregoing conditions. These policies and procedures will require, among other things, that each Regulated Entity Adviser will be notified of all Potential Co-Investment Transactions that fall within the then-current Objectives and Strategies of any Regulated Entity it advises and will be given sufficient information to make its independent determination and recommendations under conditions 1, 2(a), 7 and 8.
Start Signature
For the Commission, by the Division of Investment Management, under delegated authority.
Eduardo A. Aleman,
Assistant Secretary.
End Signature
End Supplemental Information
Footnotes

1.
     Section 2(a)(48) defines a BDC to be any closed-end investment company that operates for the purpose of making investments in securities described in sections 55(a)(1) through 55(a)(3) of the Act and makes available significant managerial assistance with respect to the issuers of such securities.

        Back to Citation
      


2.
     “Affiliated Investment Advisers” means the Existing Affiliated Investment Adviser and any future investment adviser that Medley LLC controls.

        Back to Citation
      


3.
     The requested order (the “Order”) would supersede an exemptive order issued by the Commission on November 25, 2013 (the “Prior Order”) that was granted pursuant to sections 57(a)(4) and 57(i) and rule 17d-1, with the result that no person will continue to rely on the Prior Order if the Order is granted. Medley Capital Corporation, et al., Investment Company Act Release Nos. 30769 (Oct. 28, 2013) (notice) and 30807 (Nov. 25, 2013) (order). All existing entities that currently intend to rely on the Order have been named as applicants. Any other existing or future entity that relies on the Order in the future will comply with the terms and conditions of the application.

        Back to Citation
      


4.
     “Future Affiliated Funds” means any entity whose (i) investment adviser is an Affiliated Investment Adviser, (ii) that would be an investment company but for section 3(c)(1) or 3(c)(7) of the Act, (iii) that is not a subsidiary of a Regulated Entity, and (iv) that intends to participate in the Co-Investment Program. “Affiliated Funds” means the Existing Affiliated Funds and the Future Affiliated Funds. “Regulated Entity” means any of (i) MCC, (ii) Sierra, (iii) STRF, (iv) SOF, or (v) any future closed-end investment company that is registered under the Act or has elected to be regulated as a BDC under the Act, whose investment adviser is a Regulated Entity Adviser, and that intends to participate in the Co-Investment Program. “Regulated Entity Advisers” means (i) MCC Advisors, (ii) SIC Advisors, (iii) STRF Advisors, (iv) SOF Advisors, and (v) any future investment adviser that Medley LLC controls.

        Back to Citation
      


5.
     The term “Wholly-Owned Investment Sub” means an entity (i) that is wholly-owned by a Regulated Entity (with such Regulated Entity at all times holding, beneficially and of record, 100% of the voting and economic interests), (ii) whose sole business purpose is to hold one or more investments on behalf of such Regulated Entity (and, in the case of an SBIC Subsidiary, maintain a license under the SBA Act and issue debentures guaranteed by the SBA); (iii) with respect to which the Regulated Entity's board of directors (“Board”) has the sole authority to make all determinations with respect to the entity's participation under the conditions of the application; and (iv) that would be an investment company but for section 3(c)(1) or 3(c)(7) of the Act. All subsidiaries participating in the Co-Investment Program will be Wholly-Owned Investment Subs and will have Objectives and Strategies (as defined below) that are either substantially the same as, or a subset of, their parent Regulated Entity's Objectives and Strategies. An SBIC Subsidiary may be a Wholly-Owned Investment Sub if it satisfies the conditions in this definition.

        Back to Citation
      


6.
     The Regulated Entities, however, will not be obligated to invest, or co-invest, when investment opportunities are referred to them.

        Back to Citation
      


7.
     “Follow-On Investments” means additional investments in securities of issuers, including through the exercise of warrants, conversion privileges, and other rights to purchase securities of the issuers.

        Back to Citation
      


8.
     “Objectives and Strategies” means the Regulated Entity's investment objectives and strategies, as described in the Regulated Entity's registration statement on Form N-2, other filings the Regulated Entity has made with the Commission under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the “1933 Act”), or under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the Regulated Entity's reports to stockholders.

        Back to Citation
      


9.
     This exception applies only to Follow-On Investments by a Regulated Entity in issuers in which that Regulated Entity already holds investments.

        Back to Citation
      


[FR Doc. 2017-04591 Filed 3-8-17; 8:45 am]
BILLING CODE 8011-01-P


Published Document 



















Home

Home



Sections

Money
Environment
World
Science & Technology
Business & Industry
Health & Public Welfare



Browse

Agencies
Topics (CFR Indexing Terms)
Dates
Public Inspection
Executive Orders



Search

Document Search
Advanced Document Search
Public Inspection Search





Reader Aids

Office of the Federal Register Blog
Using FederalRegister.Gov
Understanding the Federal Register
Recent Site Updates
Videos & Tutorials
Developer Resources
Government Policy and OFR Procedures



My FR

My Clipboard
My Subscriptions
My Comments
Sign In



Social Media

Facebook
Twitter



Information

About This Site
Legal Status
Contact Us
Privacy
Accessibility
FOIA
No Fear Act
Continuity Information







    Site Feedback
  




































Medley acquires Viathon Capital | Hedgeweek








































Contact
About Us / Media
Ad guidelines
Cookies
 



Login
Register
 











Sign up for free newsletter 




Operational Resource Centre

Technology Resource Centre

Market Trends









news

Special Reports

Directory

Guides

Events

Training

Jobs

Awards










HomeNewsArticles and Features

  


Tweet  

Tweet  




 


Medley acquires Viathon Capital 

Mon, 04/04/2011 - 14:15 
Tags
						: 
Articles and Features











Medley Capital has acquired credit hedge fund manager Viathon Capital LP effective March 31, 2011. Medley, a registered investment adviser with USD1.4 billion of assets under management in private investment funds, hedge funds and Medley Capital Corporation (NYSE: MCC), provides capital and advisory services to middle market corporate and asset based borrowers in North America.
 
Viathon, founded in 2006 by Robert Comizio, invests in fundamental and event driven opportunities across the credit spectrum. Predominantly focused on companies in North America and Europe, Viathon identifies both long and short investments throughout an issuer's capital structure. Prior to founding Viathon, Comizio was a Senior Portfolio Manager at Marathon Asset Management in the Special Opportunity Fund.  He began his career at Goldman Sachs after receiving an MBA from the University of Chicago and after graduating from the Wharton School at the University of Pennsylvania. Comizio will become a partner and the senior portfolio manager for Medley Credit Strategies, LLC.  
"This transaction combines the analytical and credit strengths of the two organisations," says Medley managing partner and co-founder, Brook Taube. "As a capital solutions provider to the middle market, the addition of Rob and his team will further enhance our debt and credit focused investment process and provides broader market perspectives and opportunities to both the borrower community and to our investors."







Like this article ? Get the free daily newsletter



print
email
 



 









 





Furtherreading
	

from Hedgeweek  
Best wishes for 2017 from the Global Fund Media team
Fri 23/12/2016 - 08:30


Best wishes for 2016 from the Global Fund Media team
Wed 23/12/2015 - 08:00


Hedgeweek USA Awards 2015 – last chance to vote
Thu 25/06/2015 - 10:40


Hedgeweek Global Awards 2015 – Voting now closed
Thu 15/01/2015 - 08:19


Gottex reports positive performance for alternative and multi-asset product lines
Tue 22/07/2014 - 13:01



from our other sites 

Low rates and new regulations keep market conditions challenging, says Greenwich Associates
Wed 23/07/2014 - 12:01


Beringea’s portfolio company Abzena raises GBP20m through AIM listing
Wed 23/07/2014 - 08:59


Changes to Barclays OFI SteelPath Midstream MLP Index
Tue 22/07/2014 - 12:05


CCP closes USD500m healthcare PE fund
Tue 22/07/2014 - 12:01


PowerShares Canada adds two ETFs to smart beta line
Tue 22/07/2014 - 06:03



 
 







features 


Guides 
 
2017 Guide to setting up an Alternative Investment Fund in Europe
Wed, 2017-06-21 17:28

 

Blogs 
 
Building investment fund structures - from start-up to stardom
Tue, 2017-07-25 12:05

 
 
Before you head to the beach…
Fri, 2017-07-14 09:35

 
 
The CFTC provides more robust protection to whistleblowers
Wed, 2017-07-12 14:22

 

Awards 
 
Hedgeweek Global Awards 2017
Thu, 2017-04-06 14:14

 

Special Reports 
 
Cybersecurity in Europe 2017
Wed, 2017-07-12 12:59

 
 
Mitigating compliance risk for PE managers
Thu, 2017-07-20 10:29

 
 
SEI: Blockchain & building ecosystems in financial services  
Fri, 2017-07-14 10:06

 
 
MiFID II: Meeting the compliance challenge
Sat, 2017-05-13 14:24

 
 
Investment opportunities in infrastructure debt
Thu, 2017-05-18 12:11


 
 
 







 












events

 Total Alts 
 Thursday, September 7, 2017 - 00:00  

 Catalyst Cap Intro: L/S Equity | Event Driven Investing 
 Monday, September 18, 2017 - 12:30  

 Intralinks Insights Briefing: 2017 LP Survey 
 Thursday, September 21, 2017 - 08:00  

 ALTSO’s 6th Annual Rocktoberfest 
 Thursday, October 5, 2017 - 18:00  

 Mining Investment Middle East and Central Asia 2017  
 Monday, October 9, 2017 - 09:00  

All Events



 
 






training

 International Trade Finance – Dubai 
 Sun, 2017-09-10 00:00  

 International Securities Settlements & Custodial Services - Dubai 
 Tue, 2017-09-12 00:00  

 EMIR 
 Fri, 2017-09-15 00:00  

 International Payments 
 Mon, 2017-10-02 00:00  

 Strategic Corporate Governance - Kuwait 
 Tue, 2017-10-10 22:00  

All Courses



 
 






listingsdirectory

 Augentius  
 Thu, 2017-07-06 13:44  

 IKONIC Fund Services Ltd. 
 Tue, 2016-11-29 11:28  

 Backstop Solutions Group 
 Tue, 2016-11-08 17:44  

 The Gemini Companies 
 Mon, 2016-10-17 12:51  

 FundCount LLC 
 Tue, 2016-10-04 10:30  

More Directories



 
 











specialreports

		Stay connected
		











   

   

   

   

   



    More  

 


other gfm  publications



 



News
Special Reports
Guides
Events
Directory
Jobs
Awards 
Copyright © 2017 GFM Ltd. All Rights Reserved




Welcome to Capital Strategies - Capital Strategies, Inc.

























































Home
Client Services
Our People
FAQ
Client Area
Articles
Contact Us

 
ABOUT US
SITEMAP
 

(317) 262-1700
9am - 5pm, Mon - Fri





Welcome to Capital Strategies
Capital Strategies, Inc. is a registered investment advisor that provides extensive consulting services including investment management and financial education programs. From our headquarters in Indianapolis, we provide investment supervisory services to individual clients, trustees, and corporations throughout the United States. Capital Strategies offers fee only services, charging only for assets under management. We are an independent firm that exists for the benefit of the clients. Our company is not a distribution channel for financial products.
CSI also joins with academic researchers to study the costs and benefits to employers of providing financial education and investment advice to their employees. The knowledge gained from doing research allows CSI advisors to make better consulting and investment decisions.
Take control of your financial future and assess whether you’re on track to a successful retirement in four easy steps.

 







Recent Articles

13 Secrets Shoppers Need To Know About Aldi
6 Jul 2017


7 Signs You Are Buying A Counterfeit Product
6 Jul 2017


10 Best Values in U.S. Colleges
6 Jul 2017


10 Things You Must Know About Medicare
8 Jun 2017










Copyright © 2017 Capital Strategies, Inc. All Rights Reserved. | 151 N. Delaware St., Suite 1440 | Indianapolis, IN 46204 | P: (317) 262-1700 F: (317) 262-1707



















